Title
Review for Scream 2 (1997)
Number of Reviews
36

Author
Seth Bookey
Seen on 20 December 1997 with Lynne and Sandy at the Great Neck Squire for
$24 for their birthdays. 
Sequels, especially to successful horror movies, are renowned for their
failure to retain the spirit and character of the original. But, director
Wes Craven and writer Kevin Williamson have teamed up again and created
not only a sequel that stands up on its own, but another effective horror
movie. 
It's a year after the murders in *Scream*, and a movie, "Stab", is
capitalizing on the sensationalism. This puts the spotlight on Sidney
Prescott (Neve Campbell) again, and it puts her in danger again, as
murders mirroring the incidents from the year before start happening
around the campus. Also back from the original are Jamie Kennedy as the
geeky Randy Meeks, David Arquette as the bumbling deputy Dewey Riley,
Courteney Cox as the ambitious TV reporter (and "Stab" author) Gale
Weathers, and Liev Schreiber as the innocent victim and possible killer
Cotton Weary. 
There are also a lot of newcomers, and a lot of dead people by the end of
the movie.
There is also a lot of parodying from other horror movies, and from
*Scream* itself. Having seen *Scream* is a plus, but I think *Scream 2*
succeeds on its own. But, if you saw the first movie, seeing Tori Spelling
recreating the opening of Scream in the opening of "Stab," it's a lot more
fun--more than just how funny it is seeing Tori Spelling in *anything.* 
Unlike most horror movies, *Scream 2* actually shows the intelligence of
its creators in the dialogue and the cinematography. Added but not
necessary are discussions of sequels that were better than the originals,
the film within a film, Gale being hounded by grade-B local reporter
Debbie Salt (Laurie Metcalf), and the terror for Sidney as she is
surrounded by masked figures while rehearsing in a Greek tragedy. There is
also a wonderful scene where the killer has called his next victim on a
cellular phone while in the middle of a campus quad. 
I don't want to give too much away, so I'll just finish by saying that the
movie plays with the cliches without succumbing to them, and that the cast
really does a great job in this surprisingly literate film. It's always
wonderful to watch a movie of the genre created by people who love it.
The only thing I didn't like about the movie was its title. I would've
liked any of the alternate working titles: *Scream Again*, *Scream
Louder*, or *Scream: The Sequel*. Then there's my idea: *Keep Screaming*. 
Apparently, there is a Scream 3 in the works. Let's hope it lives up to
its two predecessors. 
Also starring Sarah Michelle Gellar, Elise Neal, Jerry O'Connell, Jada
Pinkett, Omar Epps, Rebecca Gayheart, and Malcolm McDowell as the film
professor. Cinematography by Peter Deming.

More movie reviews by Seth Bookey, with graphics, can be found at
http://www.geocities.com/Athens/2679/kino.html

Author
Jason Wallis
"Scream 2" * * * 
Starring Neve Campbell, David Arquette, Courtney Cox, Liev Schreiber, Sarah
Michelle Geller, Jamie Kennedy and Laurie Metcalf 
Directed by Wes Craven 
Warning: This review reveals the endings of "Scream" and "I Know What You
Did Last Summer". If you have not seen these films, skip paragraph number
six. 
"Scream 2" has an opening very similar to that of the now classic orginal
"Scream". A couple (Jada Pincket and some other guy) are waiting in line to
see the new movie "Stab", based on the book written by media mongul Gale
Whethers which in itself was based on the murders that took place in the
first "Scream". Everyone in the theater is dressed up in that cool mask
that the killer wore in the first one, going around with glow-in-the-dark
butcher knives pretending to stab each other. The guy goes to take a piss
and wham!; is stabbed right through the ear. Then good ol' Jada is murdered
in the middle of the crowded theater. But, of course, no one notices
because the whole place is packed wall to wall with screaming fans. 
However, unlike the original's beginning sequence, this scene is not
handled very tastefully. In the first one, you had the caller playing a
brilliantly scripted cat-and-mouse game with Drew Barrymore. Here, the
victims are just brutally slautered. I hate to say this, but (although in a
sick way), it was actually fun to see the killer torment poor Drew. At
least that was suspenseful. This is just mindless gore. 
It turns out that the couple attended the same college as Sidney Presott
(Neve Campbell) and Randy (Jamie Kennedy), both survivors from the original
film. Sid is now majoring in drama and is the star of a school play and
Randy is again the film geek, this time attending film classes. 
Before I go on with the rest of the plot, I just have to talk about the
conversation that takes place in Randy's film class. They are discussing
sequels and how they always suck when compared to the first ones. I'm
mentioning this because it, unlike most of the rest of the flick, is very
smartly written. It has the same self-aware feel to it that made the first
one the great movie that it is. And why do I consider it cleverly written?
Because of the simple fact that I was anticipating what each character
would say next. The rest of the movie (save the brilliant ending) is mostly
very predictable and offers few surprises. It may just be me, but I really
dug this scene and think it's one of the best scenes in the whole flick. 
Anyway, back to the story. Needless to say, when Sid is informed about the
recent murders, she totally freaks out and begins to fear for her life.
Rightfully so, because soon the corpses start pilling up and (in the words
of Randy), everybody's a suspect. 
So who is it this time? Who is the real killer (or killers, maybe)? Could
it be Dewey (David Arquette), the now disabled bumbling cop from the first
one? I mean, his sister was murdered; isn't it possible that he's out for
revenge? Speaking of revenge, what about Cotton Weary (Liev Schreiber, in
by far the best performance of the film), the man that Sidney wrongfully
testified against for the murder of her mother? Ever since people haven't
looked at him the same way. Even though his innocence has been proven, his
life will never, ever be the same again. Of course, you can't negate the
possibility that it could actually be Gale Whethers. Maybe she wants to
have another killing frenzy so she could write another book. I mean, the
writer of "Scream 2" has pulled almost every trick in the book; in
"Scream", it was revealed that there were actually two killers. In "I Know
What You Did Last Summer", the real killer was never unmasked. Is it
possible that this time, the surprise is that the killer is a woman, like
in "Friday the 13th"? 
Well, there's no way in hell I'm going to reveal the identity of the
killer, but I will say that I guessed the ending (sorta). It was pretty
easy too, but I didn't guess everything. You kind of have to see the flick
to know what I'm talking about. 
But just because this is not anywhere near as good as it's predessessor,
when judged on it's own merit, it's basically a good movie with one of the
best endings of the nineties. So I'm going to give this one a marginal
thumbs up. Don't expect anything great, though. Of course, there's always
"Scream 3"... 
Oh, and a word of warning to those of us with weak stomachs; this sucker's
gory. And I'm talking about throat slicings, brains, shots to the head, the
works. It's not really that bad, but if you're expecting mild violence as
in the original, look elsewhere. Just thought I'd warn ya. 
Check out Jason Wallis' Filmaholics Anonymous web page at
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Boulevard/7475

Author
Nathaniel R. Atcheson
Director: Wes Craven
Cast: Neve Campbell, David Arquette, Courtney Cox, Jamie Kennedy, Laurie
Metcalf, Jerry O'Connel
Rated R: Strong violence, gore, language
by Nathaniel R. Atcheson (nate@pyramid.net)
    Is there a point at which a film can become so absurd that you
simply stop watching it? I almost got to that point during the climax of
Scream 2, which is one of the silliest, loudest, most obnoxious finales
to a film I've seen in a good long while. The film itself is an exercise
in self-awareness, where every cliché and every shot of someone being
pounced by a knife-wielding maniac is observed with a tongue-in-cheek
attitude. It seems almost pointless to even talk about the film, for
anything that I might decide to criticize it for is probably an
intentional element added by director Wes Craven and writer Kevin
Williamson not out of ignorance, but to keep the tone consistent.
    Okay, so the story is kind of weak, in that Scream sort of way, but
it doesn't matter because the characters all talk about how sequels are
"by definition," lesser films than the originals. There are, of course,
addendums to this postulate: Aliens, The Godfather Part II, Terminator
2--but, for the most part, sequels kind of suck (figuratively speaking,
of course). So some psycho goes around killing innocent college students
in an attempt to upset and later destroy Neve Campbell. "Someone has
taken his love for sequels one step too far!" shouts the preview. I
think that's an accurate assessment of the film.
    After some initial setup-gore, the characters from the original
film--Gail Weathers (Courtney Cox), Dewey Riley (David Arquette), and
Randy the movie nerd guy (Jamie Kennedy)--talk about who the killer
might me. They discuss at great lengths the ideas behind cliché
characters, about how the boyfriend isn't the killer because it's
already been done, and so forth. All the gore aside, this film is so
funny. I laughed frequently, and I'm not talking about chuckles--it was
like "HA HA HA!" funny.
    A film like Scream 2 can be successful for no other reason than it's
almost sickeningly complete tone. I mean, come on, if there is someone
standing next to a corner, then a killer will jump out from behind that
corner and drive his knife into that person several times. There's no
question about it. It's going to happen. But here we have a problem--the
movie is so funny, so unrealistic, that it actually one-ups its
predecessor as far as laughs an concept goes. In the process, the gore
and violence feels out of place and often forced.
    Scream had some genuinely frightening moments in it--the opening
scene, in particular, was tense and horrifying because we didn't know
what was going on. There isn't a single startling moment in Scream 2,
not one ounce of suspense, and the numerous shots of a knife plunging
deep into the backs of college students is really intrusive. Scream's
attitude was like, "Woah, this is like one of those horror flicks or
something." Scream 2 feels more like, "Check it out, we're in another
horror movie, and that's not possible, but isn't this wild?" I think it
would have been even better if they thought there was a killer, but it
was something else (strange forms of suicide or something like that) so
they all turn out to be wrong, but they can talk about sequels anyway.
Of course, that would be even sillier than the film already is.
    As is, the horror is an excuse for the comedy, and though it works
for the most part, elements feel out of place. The last twenty minutes,
for example, deliver an unsatisfying conclusion to the point of me
rolling my eyes and giving up on the film. Then, the heroine does some
stuff (I'll keep it a surprise) that really rubbed me the wrong way, and
I was left with a bad taste in my mouth. It looses its self-awareness
and becomes absurd out of carelessness. And that's problematic. But
reflecting back on the pre-conclusion part of the film, it's really
funny. For what it is, Scream 2 works. And if you like to laugh, then
you'll be doing some of that during the course of this film.

Author
Luke Buckmaster
REVIEW:  Scream 2 (1997 - USA, 1998 - Australia)
As the horror movie expert Randy (Jamie Kennedy) states: There are certain
rules one must abide by in order to create a successful sequel.  Scream 2; just
like its predecessor, structures itself as a parody to all those predictable
horror films that have filtered through Hollywood for decades.  But as the wise
Randy also remarks  No sequels are good as the first.
Set two years after the original killings in Scream, Sidney (Neve Campbell) and
Randy are now in university and have put the tormenting memories of their past
behind them.  TV Reporter Gale Weathers (Courteney Cox) has written a book based
around the killings two years ago, and its just recently been made into a
popular film named Stab.
Just as we witnessed Drew Barrymore killed off in the opening scenes of Scream,
another celebrity (if you can call Jada Pinkett one) is iced early on in the
sequel whilst attending Stab.  So begins a spree of copycat killings on campus.
Goofy small town cop Dewey (David Arquette) also returns, and along with Gale
and Randy attempts to figure out who the killer is.  One particularly engaging
conversation with himself and Randy occurs, where the rules of sequels are
observed.
Number one, the body count is always bigger.  Number two, the death scenes are
always much more elaborate.  Number three, never ever, under any circumstances
assume that the killer is dead.  Although the more attentive viewer of Scream
would have noticed that some of the rules were obviously broken, this is not
the case for Scream 2, as everything mentioned is carried out to the fullest
degree.
The nine killings in Scream compared to fourteen in the sequel speaks for
itself, but statistics are unfortunately limited to what happens rather than how
it happens.  Scream 2 is considerably less scarier than the first, and although
director Wes Craven (infamous for the Nightmare on Elm Street series and Scream)
follows the same shock-commotion formula, much of the seductiveness and charm
that its predecessor has seems to have been lost.  That is, as much charm as a
gruesome horror film can have.
If youre put off by the promise of good looking teens acting irrationally and
predictably, rest assured  the characters slip up but the film rarely does.
The only major stab-in-the-foot that Scream 2 gives itself is the huge amount of
gore yet marginally small amount of fear that is bestowed to the audience.
Also, as many horror films tend to do, Scream 2 kills off its most interesting
character long before credits fill the screen.  As to whom this character is I
will leave you guessing  but allow me also add that he gave both films a sense
of structuring and originality  so it would be incredibly hard to make a
successful third installment (which is currently in consideration) without him.
Although not as thrilling or classy as the original, Scream 2s Scooby Doo
who-done-it style proves to be a cut above the rest, and Wes Craven has once
again given a much-needed refreshment to the horror genre of which he has
successfully mastered.


Author
Julie Prince
Starring
Neve Campbell, Courteney Cox, David Arquette, Sarah Michelle Gellar, Jamie
Kennedy, Laurie Metcalf, Jerry O'Connell
We're not breaking new ground here, folks. 
If you liked the original Scream, you'll enjoy the sequel. But it is still
a sequel. The joy of discovery (as with the original Scream, which was the
first good slasher pic in more than 10 years) is gone.
Everyone who survived the first Scream (yes, I'm going to spoil the
original's plot;  if you haven't seen it by now, tough noogies) is back --
plucky Sydney Prescott (Neve Campbell) is now a college freshman, majoring
in theater. Randy (Jamie Kennedy), the kid who knew all the horror
cliches, is at the same college, majoring in film. Deputy Dewey (David
Arquette), crippled by his injuries, is no longer a cop;  Gale Weathers
(Courteney Cox) is still a sleazy journalist, and has written a book about
the Woodsboro murders of the first film.
As Scream 2 opens, the movie of Weathers' book on the murders from the
first film (stay with me here) is opening. Jada Pinkett and Omar Epps play
an unlucky young couple who attend the premiere of Stab, as the
movie-in-a-movie is called. 
The movie-in-a-movie stuff is a real hoot. Sydney's worst fear is realized
-- in Stab, she's portrayed by Tori Spelling. If you've seen Scream, the
movie-in-a-movie will seem very strange ... I kept thinking "No, that's
not how it really happened! I was there, I know!" This must be the way
Joey Buttafuoco felt when he watched the three TV movies about him and Amy
Fisher.
After this very promising beginning, Scream 2 becomes a pretty damned good
slasher-pic sequel. The characters have fun with the sequel cliches
(though not as much as in the original). Many people are killed. There are
some neat, nightmarish sequences, such as Sydney's rehearsal of
"Agamemnon," in which she plays Cassandra.
The movie cheats at the end; any good whodunit (which is, in essence, what
both Scream flicks are) should give subtle clues to the killer's identity.
When he or she is finally revealed, the audience should think, "Of course!
I should've known!"
Not here. The killer's identity came totally out of left field. All right,
as one character in Scream said, "It's the millennium, motives are
incidental."  But I don't think it's too much to ask that the perp have
some reason for doing what he or she does.
All criticism aside, Scream 2 is an entertaining movie. Fans of the first
are unlikely to be disappointed. 
Scream 3, apparently, is in the works. Wes Craven says he planned the
movies as a trilogy all along. I'm skeptical, but maybe he'll break new
ground with the third installment. We'll see. 
____________ http://www.peak.org/~jprince * jprince@peak.org ________________

Author
James Sanford
SCREAM 2
(Miramax)
Here's a shocker for you: A sequel that's just as much fun as the original.
Fans of last year's surprise smash "Scream" are unlikely to be disappointed
by "Scream 2," which, if anything, is even funnier and scarier than Part
One.
"I don't like being scared," grumbles Maureen (Jada Pinkett) as her
boyfriend Phil (Omar Epps) drags her into a sneak preview of "Stab," an
exploitation film based on the Woodsboro murders. "But scary movies are
great foreplay," Phil insists. What he's forgetting is that in the world of
slasher films, sex typically equals death: No one will be startled to find
out that Maureen and Phil don't survive through Reel One of either "Stab" or
"Scream 2," since their deaths are required to start screenwriter Kevin
Williamson's plot in motion.
And what a clever plot it is, spiked by hip one-liners that knowingly poke
fun at such targets as Sandra Bullock, sorority sisters and the sad state of
sequels in general. There are also good-natured jabs at the TV careers of
Neve Campbell and Courteney Cox, both of whom reprise their "Scream" roles
as, respectively, the tormented Sidney Prescott and Gale Weathers, the
self-centered journalist who has built her career on reporting Sidney's
travails. Gale has even tracked Sidney to the small-town college where she
was hoping to put the violence of her past behind her; Gale wants to squeeze
one more story out of Sidney on the weekend that "Stab" opens nationwide.
The murders at the "Stab" screening turn out to be just a preview of coming
attractions, however, as another maniac begins stalking Sidney's campus.
There is much to admire in "Scream 2," as director Wes Craven engineers some
genuinely chilling sequences (including a real shocker involving a stage
production of "Oedipus Rex") and Williamson brings back --and develops the
character of-- Deputy Dewey (played by the adorably loopy David Arquette),
who ends up becoming infatuated with Gale, almost against his will. Gale,
who now introduces herself as "Gale Weathers, author of "The Woodsboro
Murders"," just to make sure everyone is aware of her best-selling book, now
sports tiger-striped hair and a brazenly amoral attitude. "You need to check
your conscience at the door, sweetie: We're not here to be loved," she
snarls when her new cameraman objects to her underhanded journalistic
tactics.
Campbell's put-upon Sidney doesn't take on many new colors, despite her
snagging of a new boyfriend (Jerry O'Connell) and a vivacious roommate
(Elise Neal) who's certain Sidney's problems will disappear once she joins
the Delta Lambda crowd. Hopefully, the inevitable "Scream 3" will find
Sidney's character moving beyond the cowering victim she is for much of this
opus.
"Scream 2" falters only in its last third, when the pacing goes slightly
slack and the smart finale goes on a bit too long for its own good. But for
much of the two hours, Williamson and Craven do a sensational job of
alternating screams of horror with roars of hilarity. If "Scream 2" can't
claim the novelty value of the original, it can certainly stand as one of
the stronger sequels of recent years.

Author
Jamie Peck
Dimension / 2:00 / 1997 / R (gore, violence, language)
Cast: Neve Campbell; Courteney Cox; David Arquette; Jamie Kennedy; Jerry 
O'Connell; Elise Neal; Timothy Olyphant; Liev Schreiber; Sara Michelle 
Gellar; Laurie Metcalf; Jada Pinkett; Omar Epps; Lewis Arquette; Duane 
Martin; Heather Graham; Tori Spelling 
Director: Wes Craven 
Screenplay: Kevin Williamson 
(Dimension Films, "Scream 2"'s distributor, has asked press to say 
extremely little -- if anything -- about the film's twisty plot. That's 
no easy task considering the wit that deserves to be mentioned here, but 
I will do my best to be vague (now, there's a first).)
"The first one was [good], but all the rest sucked," said a  
cinematically-savvy teen in last winter's Wes Craven thriller "Scream," 
her statement referring to the films of the "Nightmare on Elm Street" 
series but really putting down franchise overkill in general. The 
comment certainly carries clout: For every truly great sequel, there 
appears to be a couple of duds, making one wonder if writers are better 
off sticking solely with fresh ideas. But like it or not, along comes 
"Scream 2." And believe it or not, it's a doozy -- a slick, sinister, 
madly subversive good time at the movies, as intent on sending up 
Hollywood's sequel syndrome as much as its prequel poked fun at slasher 
conventions. "Scream 2" is definitely that rare movie thing -- a 
follow-up that can stand along side its original with pride. 
It's been two years since a pair of overzealous horror movie fans clad 
in Edvard Munch-esque get-ups carved their way through the young 
populace of Woodsboro, California. Those surviving the ordeal have 
gotten on with their lives. Plucky heroine Sidney Prescott (Neve 
Campbell) is a drama student at the Midwestern Windsor College; her pop 
culture-whiz pal Randy Meeks (Jamie Kennedy) has tagged along. Trash 
tabloid reporter Gale Weathers (Courteney Cox) has written a best-seller 
based on their ordeal, the basis of which has been turned into a (very 
bad) movie called "Stab." And Dewey Riley (David Arquette), still 
suffering from wounds inflicted during "Scream," has left his job as a 
police officer for a while. 
Life is tranquil ... at least for a while. Several sudden murders bring 
Sidney, Randy, Gale and Dewey together again, but with suspicious eyes 
cast on each other and most of those in their surroundings -- if these 
four people learned anything from the past, it's to trust no one. Thus, 
the possible victim/potential killer list includes said quartet, as well 
as: Derek (Jerry O'Connell), Sidney's new beau; Cici (Sara Michelle 
Gellar), a chatty sorority gal; Joel (Duane Martin), Gale's cameraman 
who's not too thrilled with her blood-soaked past; Hallie (Elise Neal), 
Sidney's sassy roommate; Debbie (Laurie Metcalf), a local reporter who 
gives Gale some not-too-friendly competition; and Mickey (Timothy 
Olyphant), Randy's good friend and fellow film student. Cotton Weary 
(Liev Schreiber), the man Sidney wrongly accused of her mother's murder 
in Scream, also shows up on campus -- but why? 
Like the first Scream, Craven and screenwriter Kevin Williamson 
inaugurate things with a bang. This time, it's an extended sequence that 
finds an African-American couple (Jada Pinkett and Omar Epps) attending 
a sneak preview of "Stab," making sly references about everything from 
Sandra Bullock to the lunchmeat non-roles of blacks in slasher cinema. 
Before tragedy ensues at the screening, the movie-within-a-movie setup 
allows for plenty of jokey moments, including a scene from "Stab" which 
turns Scream's now-famous Drew Barrymore prologue on its ear. ("B----, 
hang up the phone and Star-69 his a--!" Pinkett yells at the screen.) 
It's funny, creepy stuff (I don't think I'll ever feel safe in a movie 
theater again) that effectively foreshadows the ratio of smart scares 
and spoofy laughs down the road. Another flawless example of this is a 
riotous cell phone-assault of the killer on Randy, Dewey and Gale in 
broad daylight; it builds comedically and ends with genuine terror 
because of the emotional investment made on these delicious characters. 
There are other superb set pieces, but explaining them risks ruining 
their effect. 
There are more players this time around as to provide both a higher 
number suspects and a staggering body count. It's something of a 
trade-in -- the new characters are too large in number to be as 
fully-developed as the original "Scream" gang, but this movie packs in 
knowing performances (especially by Kennedy and Cox) and more death for 
your dollar. It can be argued that, while the original might outclass it 
by a tad, Scream 2 is both scarier and funnier. It certainly doesn't 
skimp with shocks -- a major one being the killing of one cast member 
very near and dear to my heart (I actually questioned Craven and 
Williamson's judgment here, considering how much this person has added 
to these films). Sometimes you wish that more could have been done with 
Stab -- the two scenes we're shown are dead-on -- but for film fans, 
there are plenty of subtle nods to movies like "The Usual Suspects," 
"Aliens" and "The Empire Strikes Back." 
Still, "Scream 2" does so many things right, it's petty to quibble. Its 
penchant for parody is irresistible, discussions of the merits of film 
sequels and all. The attractive, solid cast is a definite bonus. And the 
denouement (while not as shocking as "Scream"'s) is priceless; the 
film's final revelation incorporates bits of a particular horror film 
prominently referred to in "Scream" with one of the best bad guy motives 
ever put on paper. All this and a "Scream 3" is in the works. Knowing 
the series' tendency for self-reference, perhaps one of its characters 
will again discuss the concept of sequel justice. Mentioning "Scream 
2"'ll help them in their argument. 
Š 1997 Jamie Peck 
E-mail: jpeck1@gl.umbc.edu
Visit the Reel Deal Online: http://www.gl.umbc.edu/~jpeck1/

Author
Lars Lindahl
Starring Neve Campbell, Courtney Cox, David Arquette, Jamie Kennedy, Liev
Scheiber, Elise Neal, Jerry O'Connell, Laurie Metcalf, Jada Pinket, Omar Epps,
Timothy Olyphant, Duane Martin, Sarah Michelle Gellar, Rebecca Gayheart, Portia
de Rossi, Joshua Jackson, David Warner, Lewis Arquette, Heather Graham, Luke
Wilson, and Kevin Williamson.
Similar to the release of Scream, I was skeptical about how good this movie
would turn out. As this sequel so blatantly proves through its horror - buff
college students, sequels are never better than the original. In fact, they
could not only be terrible, but they could also make a viewer doubtful of how
good the first one was. Scream 2 is certainly not better than Scream because it
lacks the perfect setting from the original. The teenagers living in your
traditional suburban neighborhood who attend your classic chaotic house parties
is a horror movie's dream setting. In Scream 2, the surviving kids from the
first one have grown up and now are attending a larger college. However, they
are still being attacked by a mysterious murderer in a "ghost face" mask. The
question is: who is the killer? Most of the characters have matured and now
share a stronger connection with adults living in the same town as them. The
maturity is what Scream 2 should have avoided. The fact that the kids were
nothing but "stoned dudes" in the first film made it so funny. The only real
contact the kids had to the adult world in Scream, besides the cops, was their
authoritative principal (the ubiquitous Henry Winkler) who didn't really care
about any of his students' safety. This is what was so funny about Scream, it
had your stereotypical trouble-maker teens and your basic adult who harshly
reminds these kids to behave. This is something we've seen many times before at
the theaters and can now laugh at how embarrassingly bad it is in this parody
of a horror movie.  In Scream 2, the only real adult introduced, besides cops
and reporters, is main character Sydney's drama teacher (David Warner). They
share a few pointless bonding scenes together that show that these once no good
kids are now respectable young adults. Who wants respectable young adults to be
your main characters? Not me. 
Now that the kids have grown up and hold more responsibilities, the jokes just
aren't as funny as the original. The only amusing sections are when Randy
(Jamie Kennedy) recites the rules of a sequel; there are more deaths, they are
bloodier, and anyone can be a suspect, and even these parts seem tacked on and
unnecessary to the plot. I thought screenwriter Kevin Williamson could have
added more lines about how black characters never survive in the sequel. He had
the perfect opportunity with a cameraman (Duane Martin who shines in every
scene that he is in) but unfortunately is underused. The fact that the sequel
has a lot more violence could have diminished its script from completely
shining. Williamson has the potential of a witty screenwriter but whenever he
seemed to launch a grand punch line, an outburst of violence suddenly
interrupted his train of thought. When thought over a number of times, it could
be possible that Williamson made a dissatisfactory script on purpose to prove
that sequels are always worse. Intentionally bad or not, the script is still
overwhelmingly disappointing.
Wes Craven still makes Scream 2 a pleasing attempt. The violence that he uses
may hurt the script, but it is still incredibly intense, particularly a scene
involving a police car crash. The film never drags on, its quick pace, very
similar to that of Scream, never hits a bump in the road allowing for
edge-of-your-seat action throughout. 
Scream 2 is a decent film placed at the middle of the Scream trilogy. Those
looking for mindless violence will find it, however those looking for a clever
script like the first one, may be let down.  

Author
Ben Hoffman
 If there is anything I abhor most in scary movies is when the
director stoops to using sudden loud noises to frighten the
audience.   You know the kind I mean: a door slams shut but it is
only  the wind; a loud crash but it is only the cat knocking over a
flower pot.    It would be nice if directors thought up something
new with which to scare us.   Even the use of masks, as in this
film, is an easy ploy..
 What SCREAM 2 does have going for it is that it does have a bit of
humor.  Kevin Williamson does write well.   One of the questions  he
raises are about the media and its influence on serial killers.
Which came first, the chicken or the egg?
 SCREAM, the 1996 film, was really nothing much until word of mouth
made it a must-see film with the young who do not find real life
scary enough.  That warmed the hearts of those whose job it is to
follow the box office..   Banking (sic) on that phenomenon, it was
logical to expect a SCREAM 2.
 Some of the characters who were in the original now return for the
sequel: among them are Sidney Prescott (Neve Campbell) as a student.
The original's Deputy Dewey Riley (David Arquette) has now become a
security guard
 From the original there are also Cotton (Liev Schrieber) who had
been wrongfully convicted of murder, and Gale Weathers (Courtney
Cox) who wrote a book about the Woodsboro murders in SCREAM and
whose book has turned into a  movie, STAB, which is apparently the
cause of new murders by a slasher.
 Do not try to guess who the killer is as you will have no clue.  (I
hate that in movies!)   If you like gore and blood and slashings,
this is the movie for you.  If that genre turns you on, hey,  you
will love every moment . . .even if there could have been a bit less
mayhem, a bit fewer deaths.
 Others in the cast are Randy Meeks, Sarah Michelle Gellar, Laurie
Metcalf, Elise Neal, Jerry O'Connell, Timothy Olyphant, Jada
Pinkett, Duane Martin, Rebecca Gayheart and Portia De Rossi.

Author
E. Benjamin Kelsey
SCREAM 2 has a titillating little scene that lays down the unwritten law of
horror movie sequels quite well. During a film-class discussion, Windsor
College students articulate what these inevitable laws are, and why sequels
never live up to the originals. A few rare exceptions are noted, but they left
out one . . . SCREAM 2!
1996's surprise horror blockbuster SCREAM became an instant hit and developed
an obsessive coterie of fans which included almost every teenager in America!
A sequel was unavoidable, but luckily the re-teaming of writer Kevin
Williamson and director Wes Craven gives us nothing to fear in the way of lost
entertainment. In fact, at the risk of sounding sacrilegious to all the
adorning fans of SCREAM, I would say that SCREAM 2 might even be the better
film!
Sidney Prescott (Neve Campbell), the sinuous heroine who survived a series of
murders in Woodsboro, CA in the original SCREAM, is now two years older and
off to college, majoring in theater. Meanwhile, TV journalist Gale Weathers
(Courtney Cox), who covered the murders in the first film, has since written a
book about the dreadful events; a book titled "Stab", which has been developed
into a major motion picture. As SCREAM 2 opens, a crowd of overzealous
teenagers are piling into a crowded movie theater for the premiere of "Stab",
and before long, a young couple are butchered to death, unnoticed in the midst
of hysteria. This marks the beginning of a new murder spree as an unknown
"copycat" sets out to repeat what's been done . . . and finish what hasn't!
Of course the killer is just as obsessed with movies as the killer in the
first film, and yes, movies play a huge role in the bizarre psychological
outlook the murderer holds as he/she goes about slaying an assortment of
gorgeous twenty year olds, but this *is* a sequel, and without deviating from
the original groundwork we are still given a fresh outlook on horror movies.
This is in large part due to Williamson's deliciously written script, which
will easily leave you satisfied. As much as the film condemns the use of
cliches, it is riddled with them, but it is done so effectively, and with
skillful direction by Craven, that you're not bound to complain. I will note,
however, that the "whodunit?" did wind up being the first person I suspected,
but believe me, I kept changing my mind as I tried to stay one ahead of the
movie.
All the actors outdo themselves here. We're not talking Oscar performances,
but Cambell, Cox, David Arquette as Dewey Riley, and Jamie Kennedy as Randy
all give surprisingly satisfying performances that go beyond their last
outing. The characters remain true to their roots, and yet show a clear sign
of development over the last two years. We can see how the events in the first
film has affected them, but we don't lose any of the luster that made them
such a delight to watch in the first place.
The nice thing about SCREAM 2 is that it doesn't seem off-kilter from it's
predecessor. It's a natural, smooth, and believable (as far as horror films
go) transition from film to film. We skip two years, but there doesn't seem to
be any holes or shortcuts taken in connecting the two flicks. It flows so well
that you feel more like you're reading chapter two of a book (long chapters,
eh?) than just revitalizing a cast of familiar faces. While main characters
are usually the only connection in sequels, SCREAM 2's entire plot structure
correlates *completely* with the first, making for immediate fondness and
absorption.
As I said before, SCREAM 2 easily lives up to, if not surpassing, it's
precursor. The only reason SCREAM will likely be hailed above SCREAM 2 is
because it was the first. This doesn't mean that it overcasts the unique,
whimsical humor or overall caliber of it's sequel, it just means that SCREAM
will forever be known as the movie that mocked it's own while maintaining it's
sought-after qualities. If ever a film followed it's original so well, it
would be SCREAM 2, and it makes this a definite must-see for all those
unbridled SCREAM fans out there.
SCREAM 2 fits snugly alongside SCREAM, and will hopefully receive as many high
remarks. It would top off the series quite well, if it weren't for the fact
that two movies don't really make a series. It's unlikely to assume that a
SCREAM 3 won't appear in the next few years, but if they do decide to turn
this into an undeniably acclaimed horror-trilogy, let's hope they can keep up
the fantastic work. Like they say, don't mess with perfection . . . but when a
money-making smash-hit is almost guaranteed, who's gonna listen?

Author
Tim Voon
Cast: Neve Campbell, Courtney Cox, David Arquette, Jamie Kennedy, Liev
Schreiber, Jada Pinkett, Sarah Michelle Gellar, Laurie Metcalf, Omar
Epps, Jerry O'Connell, Timothy Olyphant Director: Wes Craven Screenplay:
Kevin Williamson
If something works well for a movie, don't change it. Keep what worked
in SCREAM and apply it to SCREAM 2.
Principle 1: Keep the blood bath going with multiple stab wounds, and in
the meantime kill as many people as you can.
Victim 1: Is pissing peacefully in toilet, before the moment of relief
is interrupted with a knife through the head. Victim 2: Watching a
movie, stab, scream, stab, scream, stab, scream. Victim 3: Blonde Girl
from I KNOW WHAT YOU DID LAST SUMMER and BUFFY THE VAMPIRE SLAYER TV
series, redoes her famous run through the house chased by serial killer
number. Victim 5: The guy who talks too much gets it in the Van. Victim
6: Boyfriend gets crucified. Victim 7: Gets mulched by the good old but
handy axe. Victims 8 and 9: Don't forget the cops. Victims 10: Get rid
of the best friend.
Principle 2: Keep them guessing right to the very end. There are two
killers in the original SCREAM. This movie doesn't stray from the
original format and you may even guess who the killer(s) are, but the
motive although cliché, is a mystery in itself.
As with the first movie, I was simultaneously shocked and amused, at how
quickly the cast was decimated in number by the end of the movie. Those
who remain standing are the major leads but even they must go through
near death experiences. Sadly, Neve Campbell doesn't cop the axe like I
wanted her to, and disappointingly so, because she's the only one I
wanted out of the movie. Courtney Cox reprises her role as the bitchy
reporter, but despite her defensive female front, is still very
likeable. I wept for my favourite character Dewey (David Arquette),
handicapped after the original SCREAM, one can only imagine the worse
scenario after this movie - perhaps paraplegic or quadriplegic. On the
bright side, SCREAM 3 may be a bit of a REAR WINDOW, which would be
something to look forward two.  This is an overall satisfactory sequel
to the original.
Timothy Voon
e-mail: stirling@netlink.com.au
http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Tim+Voon
http://www.labyrinth.net.au/~bouclier/week/movies.html

Author
Alex Fung
SCREAM 2 (Dimension - 1997)
Starring David Arquette, Neve Campbell, Courteney Cox,
  Sarah Michelle Gellar, Jamie Kennedy, Laurie Metcalf, Elise Neal,
  Jerry O'Connell, Timothy Olyphant, Jada Pinkett, Liev Schreiber
Screenplay by Kevin Williamson
Produced by Cathy Konrad, Marianne Maddalena
Directed by Wes Craven
Running time: 120 minutes
Note: Some may consider portions of the following text to be spoilers.
      Be forewarned. 
    -------------------------------------------------------------
   On December 20, 1996, amidst all the year-end Oscar bait releases
   from the major studios, Miramax's genre label Dimension Films quietly
   released a sly little ensemble slasher flick titled SCREAM.  Although
   the teen horror market had been given up for all-but-dead in recent
   years, the film shocked industry observers by scoring consistently
   high box office returns, eventually topping $100 million domestic and
   becoming one of the most successful films of its type in history,
   while delighting audiences by finally presenting a set of knowing
   slasher flick protagonists who were aware of the all the standard
   cliches associated with the genre.  The sleeper success of SCREAM
   sent shockwaves through the industry -- suddenly, everybody was
   looking for hip, inexpensive fright films that might be able to reap
   similar fortunes.  The strategy of casting young TV stars to draw the
   youth demographic was given a boost.  SCREAM director Wes Craven,
   previously best known as the creator of New Line's A NIGHTMARE ON
   ELM STREET film series, was thrust back into the limelight.  And
   SCREAM's rookie scribe, Kevin Williamson, burst onto the film scene
   in stunning fashion.
   It's hard to understate this last point.  Mr. Williamson has, based
   upon his produced screenplays as of this writing (SCREAM, I KNOW WHAT
   YOU DID LAST SUMMER from October 1997, and now SCREAM 2), enjoyed a
   meteoric rise to fame, quickly become the most well-known
   screenwriter amongst the Entertainment Weekly-reading, box office
   figure-watching youth culture since -- well, since that Quentin
   Tarantino guy (whom, it is said, has also achieved some renown as a
   director).  Indeed, in a singularly freakish oddity, it is the
   screenwriter, Mr. Williamson, and not the director that has been
   receiving the lion's share of acclaim for the success of SCREAM, and
   the print advertisements for SCREAM 2's theatrical release are
   similarly indicative of his increasing prominence: while the
   traditional "A FILM BY WES CRAVEN" drapes the film's title in the
   ads, right below it (in equal sized font, yet) reads "WRITTEN BY
   KEVIN WILLIAMSON", an affirmation of the screenwriter's contribution
   to the project which may be unprecedented.  (I can envision the board
   of WGA, licking their chops at this coup and counting the days until
   their goal of "A FILM BY " is attained.)
   And, much like Mr. Tarantino's screenwriting, Mr. Williamson's work
   is vaguely unconventional, incorporating both contemporary pop
   culture references and allusions to other films into the dialogue of
   his characters.  In SCREAM, they satirically discussed other horror
   films; here in the sequel, the characters discuss the relative merits
   of film sequels.
   SCREAM was written in 1995 during the infamous Bob Dole rampage
   against Hollywood, and Mr. Williamson's rejection of this tirade
   clearly influenced the writing in both that film and this sequel.
   While the sequel was planned from the outset -- a treatment of SCREAM
   2 was included when Mr. Williamson sold the screenplay for SCREAM --
   the basic premise for the film and the reunion of the surviving
   characters nevertheless seems extremely artificially contrived, and
   it's only at about the film's midway point when it becomes engaging.
   Like its predecessor, SCREAM 2 opens with a splashy, eye-grabbing
   prologue which only vaguely ties into the film's principal narrative;
   this time around, we're following the exploits of a young couple
   (Jada Pinkett and Omar Epps) attending a riotously gleeful sneak
   preview screening of STAB (a running film-within-a-film gag where the
   "true life" events behind the first film has been turned into a
   movie).  However, although it tries hard and has some good ideas --
   the nightmarishly enthusiastic audience in the film vaguely reminded
   me of the one I was sharing the theatre with, and I was certainly
   thinking about gutting the overly-noisy person a few seats away
   myself after about fifteen minutes -- the prologue is a pale
   imitation of the bravura opening sequence in the original with Drew
   Barrymore (where her performance not only convinced me that she
   *could* act, but was so good that it would rank among the best
   performances in a horror film that I've ever seen).  There are too
   many knowing, hip pop-culture references crammed into the SCREAM 2
   sequence, and the setup isn't nearly as cleverly frightening as
   SCREAM's; while the first film's preface dizzyingly built up to a
   final shot that was exhilaratingly terrifying, the payoff here is
   almost campily theatrical.
   Flash to the campus of a smalltown Ohio college, where returning
   characters Sidney (Neve Campbell) and Randy (Jamie Kennedy) have
   relocated for their studies and to escape the notoriety from the
   events in the first film.  The murders which open this film result in
   reuniting the survivors -- single-minded tabloid TV reporter Gale
   Weathers (Courteney Cox) roars into town to cover the breaking story,
   while ever-awkward former deputy Dewey Riley (David Arquette) flies
   in to protectively guard over Sidney.  They're joined by Cotton Weary
   (Liev Schreiber), who was falsely accused of homicide in a cameo
   appearance during the first film; his role here is significantly
   expanded.  The film incidentally provides surprisingly little
   backstory, although I suppose a good case can be made that it really
   isn't necessary -- not because so many people have seen the first
   installment, but because this is, after all, a sequel to a slasher
   film: what do you *think* happened to these characters in the prior
   movie?
   There's a lot of new faces on the scene too: Sidney's new boyfriend,
   Derek (Jerry O'Connell) and her new roommate Hallie (Elise Neal),
   Randy's fellow film student Mickey (Timothy Olyphant), Gale's
   newly-assigned nervous cameraman Joel (Duane Martin), omnipresent
   local journalist Debbie Salt (Laurie Metcalf), co-ed Cici Cooper (Ms.
   Buffy herself, Sarah Michelle Gellar), and a pair of simpering
   sorority sisters (Rebecca Gayheart and SIRENS' Portia Di Rossi).  Any
   of these characters could be the killer -- or for that matter, could
   be the next victim.
   As is seemingly becoming a regular staple of a Kevin Williamson
   screenplay, the narrative is once again framed around the
   increasingly-flimsy premise of a whodunit.  One problem that SCREAM
   didn't have was keeping you interested in the identity of the killer.
   Here (and to some extent in I KNOW WHAT YOU DID LAST SUMMER), Mr.
   Williamson's screenplay seems slightly hampered by trying to turn the
   identity of the killer into a mystery.  The film occasionally becomes
   so bogged down with misdirection that you can sense it straining at
   the seams to try and drop red herrings left and right at the expense
   of its thriller elements.  (It doesn't help matters any that the
   killer's alter-ego is fairly obvious from the get-go.)
   Indeed, the finale plays as full-out camp when the villain is finally
   unmasked, frothing at the mouth with glazed eyes.  This is one of
   those cases where the villain goes on such an endless diatribe about
   their machinations, scheming, and motivation, that you actually get
   bored listening and just want them all to get on with it.
   While the basic setup and premise for the film is fairly contrived,
   the aspect where it's head-and-shoulders above its predecessor is in
   its suspense sequences.  They're staged much more imaginatively here
   (save for the first post-prologue murder, which is handled in such a
   mediocre, conventional fashion that it seems to be culled directly
   from the predictable 1980s slasher flicks that the first film
   satirized), and are much more fun to watch.  It's hard to hold back a
   smile during a giddy scene where Sidney and her companion have to
   climb over the incapacitated killer in order to escape from a car
   wreck, and a cat-and-mouse chase involving Gale and Dewey in a campus
   sound lab is very nicely staged, although its ultimate resolution is
   hilariously overblown.
   In terms of its characters, the strong part of the film is the
   interesting relationship between Gale and Dewey (who ambles onto the
   screen accompanied by his very own theme music).  Their verbal
   sparring at the outset provides much humour -- an exchange where
   Dewey defensively rebukes charges of a perceived aura of incompetency
   is well-written -- and there's a curiously endearing aspect about
   their relationship amidst all the mayhem and bloodshed.
   On the other hand, Sidney is pretty dull here.  She doesn't have any
   compelling presence, and there's nothing particularly interesting
   about her this time around to make us care about her other than that
   she's the returning heroine.  Given this, and the fact that there's
   no strong second banana character for Sidney (Elise Neal's role isn't
   nearly substantive enough to adequately fill Rose McGowan's shoes),
   it's no wonder why the roles for Gale and Dewey have been
   significantly augmented for this installment of the film.
   What surprises me the most about SCREAM 2 is its zealousness in
   decimating its cast.  The film's mounting body count bears out the
   fact that *no* character is safe (well, *almost*); while in principal
   I applaud this bold policy, at some point you've got to be wondering
   about just how many characters will make it to the next sequel.  (I
   was particularly surprised with the untimely demise of one in
   particular, whose casting for the next installment of the series
   would've seemed obvious.)  But hey, as Rose McGowan's character said
   in the first film: "No, please don't kill me, Mr. Ghostface -- I want
   to be in the sequel!"  Look what that got her.
--
Alex Fung (aw220@freenet.carleton.ca) | http://www.ncf.carleton.ca/~aw220/
"There was a six-year-old girl sitting near me, and she piped up 'That's
 Harvey Keitel' within seconds of the film's start.  I want to know what
 that kid's been seeing." - Charles Odell

Author
Kevin Patterson
Scream 2  ***1/2 (out of four)
Directed by Wes Craven. Written by Kevin Williamson.
Starring Neve Campbell, Courtney Cox, David Arquette.
Only a year after the initial release of "Scream," the horror send-up from
veteran horror director Wes Craven and screenwriter Kevin Williamson that
seemed to breathe new life into the slasher genre, the inevitable sequel
"Scream 2" has arrived in our theaters. While the tongue-in-cheek, parodic
element is still noticeable in this film, it's really a sideshow to a broader
commentary on violence and the media and a more conventional horror story. The
first film, while often violent and gruesome, was mostly lacking in genuine
scares because almost every scene was played for camp value and the discussion
of the quirks and cliches of horror movies was nearly constant.
The premise of "Scream 2" is that a series of copycat killings begin when a
movie called "Stab," based on a book written by opportunistic reporter Gail
Weathers (Courtney Cox) about the events in "Scream," is released and two
audience members are killed during the opening screening. I had heard about
this scene before I went to see the film and was surprised to find this
sequence largely lacking in camp comedy. Its conclusion, in which a bleeding,
wounded woman stumbles in front of the screen and dies in front of an audience
that cheers on because they think it's a publicity stunt, is more surreal and
disturbing than anything else.
The satire in "Scream 2" thus takes on a broad focus and gradually evolves
into an exploration of media perceptions in general. Although resident horror
film geek Randy (Jamie Kennedy) is back with fresh dialogue about sequels
(and, interestingly enough, how they are usually inferior to their
predecessors), the characters in this movie are drawing from other entries in
the pop culture encyclopedia as well. Everything from "Friends" and "Saved by
the Bell" to "Showgirls" and "Terminator 2" is referenced here; horror is only
one of many genres available for lampooning, and there aren't any "Wes
Carpenter" jokes this time.
More importantly, this film portrays characters willing to go to disturbing
lengths for media attention as well as characters whose perceptions have
clearly been warped by what they have seen on TV and film. The killings are
clearly an imitation of the previous murders from "Scream" (in fact, the
culprit even plans to use the influence of horror movies as a courtroom
defense), Weathers exploits the situation for her own notoriety, and one man
seems willing to save the heroine's life only if it will earn him an interview
on the Today Show. Understandably, "Scream 2" does not go so far as to
actually blame the movies, but rather shows that those who do imitate horror
movies are already sick and twisted.
Couple that with the fact that several of the characters, most notably the
lead character Sidney Prescott (Neve Campbell), are fairly well-developed and
that there are some genuine moments of spine-chilling suspense, and what we
have is a pretty darned good horror movie in its own right. We don't just get
the horror of scary masks and graphic gore - we also get the horror of
sympathetic characters who seem helpless as their friends are slaughtered
(and, in one case, a significant character who was an audience favorite even
bites the dust) and whose lives have been reduced to constant fear of a crazed
murderer lurking around the corner. While I have not seen any of his other
work, it's easy to see why Craven is generally touted as the most
sophisticated "slasher film" director, as he clearly cares about something
more than just the actual acts of slashing.
Unfortunately, "Scream 2" occasionally reverts to the time-honored horror
tradition of throwing logic out the window. For example, several characters
seem quite clearly dead and inexplicably turn up alive later - there has been
a running gag in both movies about the villain being able to pull off this
particular trick, but it also happens with other characters and in an even
less believable fashion. There are also a few scenes in which the killer
suddenly appears behind the next victim in a situation such that (s)he clearly
would have been seen moving in that direction.
As for the question of whether or not "Scream 2" is yet another sequel not as
good as its predecessor . . . well, it's hard to say. I gave the first
"Scream" 3 1/2 stars as well because it worked pretty consistently as a
light-hearted send-up. "Scream 2" bounces all over the place stylistically,
but it does a better job delivering the genuine scares and asking the
questions about media violence that were only hinted at in the first
installment. I'm not sure which is the better movie, but I did leave the
theater convinced of one thing: sequels, however much Randy might argue, do
not necessarily suck.

Author
Edward Johnson-Ott
Scream 2 (1997)
Neve Campbell, Courtney Cox, Liev Schreiber, David Arquette, Jamie 
Kennedy, Sarah Michelle Gellar, Jada Pinkett, Jerry O'Connell, Luarie 
Metcalf, Tim Olyphant. Directed by Wes Craven
*** stars (out of *****)
Review by Ed Johnson-Ott, NUVO Newsweekly 
For more reviews, go to www.nuvo-online.com and click on "film."
"I wrote "Scream" to draw attention to itself," said Kevin Williamson in 
a interview earlier this fall. "I sat down and said "All right Kevin, 
stop being an artist, you're unemployed and starving, be a businessman". 
I looked around to see what was missing, what wasn't happening in the 
film market, and decided to take a shot at scary movies. I thought if 
people saw the script they might think I had a voice for something else. 
Then it sold. Who could have dreamed all of this would happen?"
Williamson's basic concept was a great one; a slasher movie populated 
with slasher movie fans who knew all the rules of the genre. No one would 
mistake "Scream" for great art, but the cagey mixture of comedy and 
horror, packed to the hilt with pop culture references, was wildly 
entertaining, and the film blew the roof off of theaters last December. 
"Scream 2" was created quickly, both to capitalize on the success of the 
original and to insure the availability of Williamson, director Wes 
Craven ("A Nightmare On Elm Street") and those actors whose characters 
survived the original film. Like the "Star Trek" movies, "Scream 2" 
operates on the assumption that audiences have seen the original and 
remember who's who. For those who came in late, here's a quick refresher 
course. 
On the anniversary eve of her mother's murder, Sidney Prescott (Neve 
Campbell) is horrified to learn that two of her classmates were brutally 
killed. In short order, she receives a call from the killer, a movie 
freak who taunts her with questions about slasher films. Sidney barely 
survives an assault from the maniac in a ghost mask, then finds herself 
in the center of a media circus. Tabloid reporter Gale Weathers (Courtney 
Cox) relentlessly pursues Sidney and her friends, enlisting the aide of 
Deputy Dwight "Dewey" Reilly (David Arquette) in her attempts to get the 
story. Sidney hates Weathers for cashing in on her personal tragedy with 
a book that questioned her mother's morals and challenged Sidney's 
identification of Cotton Weary (Liev Schreiber) as the man who killed her 
mom. After a night of incredible violence, Sidney learns that Weathers 
was right.
Jump to a year later, as Sidney attends college and tries to put the 
horror behind her. "Scream 2" begins a few blocks from the school, at a 
sneak preview for "Stab," the film based on Gale Weather's book about the 
murders. The unusually generous promoters pass out Ghostface masks, cowls 
and plastic knives to the excited young audience, who have a ball hooting 
at the cheesy horror film (when the "Stab" heroine receives the initial 
call from the killer and panics, an audience member shouts "Bitch, hang 
up and Star 69 his ass!") until a real killing happens right in the 
theater. For Sidney, Dewey (now a security guard at the college,) fellow 
survivor Randy (Jamie Kennedy) and Gale Weathers, the nightmare has 
started again.
Williamson and Craven knew exactly what made "Scream" click, and they get 
the same elements cooking here. Sidney is a drama major and Randy is a 
film student, creating a natural context for the requisite movie 
references and in-jokes. "Stab," the film within a film, offers more 
opportunities for pop culture riffing. Luckily, Williamson was smart 
enough not to overdo the humor. There's lots of laughs in "Scream 2," but 
not so many as to undermine the fear factor. In fact, the attacks are 
actually a bit more intense here than in the original, thanks to some 
innovative set pieces. The ingenious opening in a darkened theater, with 
dozens of audience members dressed as Ghostface, delivers just the right 
blend of horror and giggles. An outdoor scene, with the four survivors 
standing together in an large open area as the killer taunts them by cell 
phone, generates real tension. 
The highlight of the film comes as Sidney rehearses a play, surrounded by 
a robed, masked Greek chorus. Scored by Danny Elfman, the sequence 
becomes more and more surreal as Sidney tries in vain to suppress her 
fear amidst the swirling masked figures. Craven's camera work in the 
segment is exceptional, reminiscent of the best classic horror films.
Despite many strong moments, "Scream 2" is slightly less satisfying than 
the original. There are simply too many characters (when the identity of 
a key character is revealed, my first thought was "now which one was he?
") and the climax of the film is convoluted and awkward. Still, winning 
performances (particularly from Arquette and Cox, who create sparks 
together,) some exceptional set pieces, and the sheer ingeniousness of 
the concept keep the franchise afloat. "Scream 2" may be little more than 
cinematic fast-food, but the stuff is still pretty tasty. 

Author
Jerry Saravia
"Horror movie sequels suck," says a film student at one point. "The entire
horror genre was destroyed by sequels." I couldn't agree more considering the
junk that preceded the original "Scream" such as "Halloween: The Curse of
Michael Myers" or "Wes Craven's New Nightmare" to name a few. I approached
"Scream 2" with the same kind of dread: why make a sequel to a self-referential
movie that didn't exactly ask for a follow-up? Surprisingly, "Scream 2" is that
rare sequel that is far superior to the original in every aspect - it is
wittier, funnier, bloodier and, double surprise, more cunning and clever. It's
also a more effective commentary on teens and twentysomethings who get wrapped
up in the mundane slasher/horror films of yesteryear. 
"Scream 2" brings back Sidney (Neve Campbell), the strong screaming heroine
from the original Scream, who now has a new boyfriend (Jerry O'Connell), and is
attending a midwestern school called Windsor College. This time, she has
caller-ID and can tell when someone is playing a prank on her. Jamie Kennedy is
also back as the geeky survivor from the original who is now a geeky film
student at the same college. All is well until someone dressed in the Edvard
Munch-like mask and black cape begins to stalk the streets again. The killer is
now hacking off girls at the college's sorority, a group whom Sidney wisely
decided not to join (Shades of "Black Christmas"). The corpses begin to pile up
forcing tabloid reporter/superstar Gale Weathers (Courteney Cox) to unwisely
report on the murderous news, once again. These incidents also bring the former
police officer Dewey (David Arquette), another survivor from the original, back
to visit his old friends and to rekindle his romance with the unwilling Gale.
And we also see Liev Schreiber (he had a brief cameo in "Scream") as the
wrongly convicted Cotton who's looking for a little pay back.
"Scream 2" might seem like just another slasher picture with better actors, but
it is more than that - it manages to be a sequel-within-a-sequel film that
keeps referring back to itself in clever, original ways. For example, we see
that Gale's book on the events in the first film had been made into a feature
film called "Stab." We see clips from the film starring Heather Graham ("Boogie
Nights") in the Drew Barrymore role, and Tori Spelling as Sidney, an actress
whom the real Sidney had scoffed at in the first film. And then we have the
coup de resistance: the opening sequence set in a movie theatre showing the
film "Stab" where most of the audience is in costume waving fake knives.
However, the real killer may be somewhere in the theatre. 
And there are the requisite in-jokes and little asides. My favorite is when
Gale refers to her nude Website as her head on "Jennifer Aniston's body." I
also liked the scene where the geeky film student is talking to the killer on a
cell phone: "My favorite scary movie is 'Showgirls'. Very frightening." And the
aforementioned sequel discussion in film class is a classic. 
"Scream 2" is very effective in establishing its characters including Sidney,
the 90's horror version of Jamie Lee Curtis impressively played by Neve
Campbell, who still harbors certain doubts about the people in her life, such
as her boyfriend who may or may not be the killer. Campbell has several good
scenes, and she, once again, makes Sidney a sympathetic, heroic character. She
has a very moving scene where she is performing the part of Cassandra on stage
stalked by actors in demon outfits. One of them turns out to be the killer
wearing the mask, or was it just a hallucination? Courteney Cox is more
animated and hilarious, this time, as the media-obsessed Gale who has a
fixation on the killer and can't wait to see when he'll strike next. She has a
hysterically funny scene where she hires a new cameraman who's hesitant to work
for her because he might get killed like the last one. "He wasn't gutted. I
made that up. His throat was slashed," admits Gale. The cameraman's response:
"Gutted, slashed - the guy is not in the union anymore. Besides, brothers don't
last long in situations like this." Isn't that the truth? 
"Scream 2" is strictly by-the-numbers in terms of plot structure and story, but
it also tends to be unpredictable. There are the usual scares but some of them
are unexpected. Basically, it's a sequel about a sequel being made as we are
watching it - you can almost feel the giddiness in Gale's character as she
becomes aware that the events happening around her is good material for her
next book that will eventually be made into a movie sequel to "Stab." Get it?
"Scream 2" is part of the 90's postmodern movement where we are consistently
reminded we're watching a movie about a movie-within-a-movie.
Director Wes Craven still knows how to build suspense and thrills better than
any other horror director: the opening pre-credit sequence with Jada Pinkett as
a moviegoer at the "Stab" screening is one of the most frightening and
compelling scenes I've ever seen, certainly topping the Barrymore opening from
the original. Screenwriter Kevin Williamson, who also helmed the original, has
crafted a smarter, more character-oriented script with sharper dialogue and a
keener eye for detail. "Scream 2" also succeeds in pinpointing the problem of
teenagers and twentysomethings obsessed with violence in American movies today,
especially horror movies, and how many of them will blame the entertainment
industry for their own blood lust. 
"Scream 2" was easily one of the most entertaining movies of 1997, and it is
Wes Craven's best work since the original "Nightmare on Elm Street." Neve
Campbell and the whole cast bring a sense of humanity and pathos that
definitely makes this a cut above the rest. As a character rightly suggests at
the end of the film: "It's going to be one hell of a movie." 
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at
http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, concerns or general complaints at
faustus_08520@yahoo.com or at Faust667@aol.com

Author
Berge Garabedian
Successful follow-up to the ever-popular SCREAM (8/10) which
regenerated the horror genre back in 1996, and has since parlayed the
genre into a couple of lame copycats, and one other neat success with
I KNOW WHAT YOU DID LAST SUMMER (7.5/10). 
PLOT:
Sidney finds herself in college two years after all of the murders
went down in Woodsboro back in the original SCREAM. A movie called
"Stab", based on the events of the small town, as written in the book
by Gale Weathers, has also just come out, and sparked what appears to
be a "copycat killer" on the campus grounds. Who can this wacky person 
be? Scary stuff ensues.
CRITIQUE:
Some thrills. Some chills. But overall, just a basic scary movie that
does little to improve on the elements tiled down in the first, and
more effective, SCREAM. Ironically, one running theme in this film is
how movie sequels generally don't surpass their originals in regards
to quality, and SCREAM 2 is a perfect example of that well-founded
theory. Mind you, this is not a bad film by any stretch of the
imagination (some pretty neat murders, and another pretty decent "who
donnit?" premise), but it just doesn't live up to the first. 
Having said that, I think that this statement has less to do with the
actual content and quality of this picture, and more with the
sensitized nature of its audience during this second time a go-go. I
guess we all just need something a little more spectacular to impress
us, now that this genre is back "in" again (And while the addition of
every other Joe and Mary "young, hip Hollywood" actor might bring in
some box-office bucks for the first and second weeks of release, it
sure does little to impress us once they (on the most part) waste
their jolly time on the big screen.) 
The acting was fair in this picture, but I saw the Campbell character
as a little too nerve-wrecked for my taste. The film references by
writer Williamson were extremely well-sprinkled, and enjoyed mucho by
yours truly (For the record, I definitely agree with the man's theory
about ALIENS (8/10) being a much better film than its predecessor,
ALIEN (7/10)). Also, I liked the fact that most of the African-American
characters in this film seemed to be much wiser to the whole carnage
scenario, as opposed to most Hollywood pictures, in which there
always seems to be a convenient "murder seat" reserved for the token
black characters. The cameraman in this movie was especially funny and
enjoyable.
Another thing that really didn't compare to the first movie was its
ending. I was thoroughly surprised and amazed by the ending of the
original SCREAM, as opposed to this one, which just left me kind of
shrugging my shoulders in indifference. Also, even though I am
reviewing this movie as a person who has already seen and thoroughly
enjoyed the first movie, I thought it might be harder for those
non-original SCREAM viewers, to fully comprehend the many references
to the first film. Oh well. 'Tis life in the big city, I suppose.
Overall, I guess this flic is a good scary movie for a long, dark,
lonely old night with your loved-nacho by your side. But for your
complete enjoyment faculties to truly savour all the delicacies in this
decent spook-fest, I suggest you rent the original before popping this
pepper into your VCR, and then of course... don't forget to scream !!!
Little Known Facts: 
SCREAM AGAIN and SCREAM LOUDER were two titles that were also
considered for this sequel's title.
Neve Campbell won the 1997 MTV Movie Award for Best Female
Performance for her role in this film.
Jerry O'Connell played the fat kid in STAND BY ME (7.5/10), who
majorly puked over the audience during a pie-eating contest. After that
movie, Jerry went back to school, and did not become a full-time actor
until he graduated from NYU with a degree in film and television.

Author
Marty Mapes
*** (out of 4) SCREAM 2, like its predecessor, is a genre-crossing film.
It is about 50% horror film and 50% murder mystery. The mix worked very
well last time and it continues to entertain this time. 
SCREAM was also known for its self-referential tone. Many inside jokes
were made in reference to horror movies and Wes Craven. Again, SCREAM 2
follows suit with characters saying such things as "sequels suck" and
"the entire horror genre was destroyed by sequels." 
SCREAM 2's story is very similar to it's predecessor's. Sidney (Neve
Campbell), having survived the killing spree in SCREAM, is now in
college. Gale Weathers (Courteney Cox) has written a book about the
murders and that book is now being released as a feature film, called
STAB (which for all practical purposes is the real-world movie SCREAM).
At the premiere of STAB, two students from Sidney's college are stabbed
to death, and a new story begins. 
The press descends on Sidney and her college to get the scoop on this
sequel killer. They want to know all about the links between STAB,
Sidney, and the recent murders. 
The most complex self-reference I saw (this should be an Olympic event)
was the scene where Gale Weathers was asking questions at a press
conference. The rest of the press was watching and videotaping Weathers.
The other survivors from SCREAM were watching and videotaping the press.
The audience was watching the whole, filmed scene. (Whew.) 
The movie is packed with layers and self-references that make it a
pleasure to watch. Even better would be to watch a double feature of
SCREAM and SCREAM 2. That's not to say that these references necessarily
make SCREAM 2 a deep, or even a GOOD movie. The just add to the fun of
watching it. I recommend it for other reasons as well. 
What I liked best about the horror aspect of the movie is that the
monster is not supernatural. No werewolf or ghost or psycho with
superhuman strength is responsible. It is a person in a mask and a robe,
his only advantage the fear he strikes into his victims. No
extraordinary leap of faith is needed to believe in the killer. The down
side is that if you are frightened by horror movies, you have less
grounds to say "it's just a movie." 
The whodunit aspect of the movie is not that great by itself - Gale
Weathers and Deputy Dewey (David Arquette, also from the original) track
down a killer. They are likeable, but not outstanding. But in
combination with the horror aspect, the whodunit is a perfect
counterpoint. 
It was exactly a year ago today that I wrote the review for SCREAM. The
Internet Movie Database says that SCREAM 3 is in the works, so I wonder
if I'll be doing the same thing on January 1, 1999. If Craven and
screenwriter Kevin Williamson are able to keep the quality high, I'll be
happy to mark my calendar.
Check out more current movie reviews at http://www.indra.com/~mmapes/

Author
Steve Kong
"Sequels suck," exclaims one of the characters in Scream 2. But, do they?
After the phenomenal run of Scream, there was no doubt that a sequel would
be produced. One could only hope that the creative team behind Scream would
return for the sequel to create a movie as good or better than the first.
Fortunately, the creative team behind Scream has returned to work on Scream
2. Director Wes Craven and writer Kevin Williamson return to make Scream 2.
Scream 2 opens about two years after the events in Scream. The
introduction, not unlike that of Scream, is a short piece that illustrates
the self-mocking ways of Craven and Williamson. Drew Barrymore is replaced
this time by Jada Pinkett and Omar Epps. This opening sequence had a
strange effect on me. It's one thing to scare the audience, but then it is
another thing to completely creep out the audience. The opening sequence
takes place in a darken theatre premiering STAB, a film based on the "true
life" events of Scream, which is also based on the book by Gale Weathers
(Courtney Cox). The creepiness of the prologue comes from it bringing the
horror so close to the audience. It took the horror of the film right into
the theatre, which made me feel scared all the way through the rest of the
film, and I'm pretty sure everyone will also.
After this introduction we get into the meat of the film. Sidney Prescott
(Neve Campbell) is off to Windsor College. As the movie STAB opens to the
public, the body count starts to mount. We are introduced to an ensemble
cast of characters, all who could be the copy-cat murderer. And, from this
point on, the scares are many and the body count rises quickly.
Scream 2 takes from the first in its satirical look at slasher films and
its blatant tongue in cheek events. The characters are unafraid to speak
their minds and the dialogue is sharp, witty and hilarious. It seems that
Williamson can find humor in dialogue in any morbid situation. The dialogue
is filled with pop references and is not afraid to poke fun at some of the
best known people, including two of Cox's "Friends" co-stars, David
Shwimmer and Jennifer Aniston. ("That's just my head pasted on Jennifer
Aniston's body," Weathers exclaims as one character asks her about the nude
pictures of her on the Internet.)
What about the horror part of the film? Craven is at his best here in
Scream 2. There are many scary and thrilling moments including one staged
in a car that had most everyone at the edge of their seats and squirming.
Craven finds the right mix between gore, horror, scares, and humor with
Scream 2.
Williamson redeems himself with the Scream 2 script. His last project, I
KNOW WHAT YOU DID LAST SUMMER, was horribly mediocre and not on the same
level as either Scream of Scream 2. Some of this can be accounted for
because of Craven's expertise, but a lot of it is because of Williamson's
creativity in writing the script. The whodunit portion of the film is well
done, though as the film progressed I was able to correctly guess who the
killer was at the end.
Though Neve Campbell is the star of the film it is Courtney Cox who shines.
 Cox is cocky and very hate-able as Gale Weathers, a woman who is always
looking for a good story to promote herself.  Cox is just great in this
role.  This is not to say that Campbell is not good in her role though, she
is also fabulous as Sidney Prescott, the girl who is sick and tired of all
the games that are being played with her life.  David Arquette, as the
returning Dewey, is also really good.  All around, the cast of Scream 2 is
excellent throughout the film.
One thing that I noticed was that there was a bit of recycled music in
Scream 2, which is a small portion of Hans Zimmer's BROKEN ARROW
soundtrack.  They used John Travolta's BROKEN ARROW theme for Dewey, which
at first came off as cheesy to me, but after awhile it did work pretty well.
Craven also has fun with the first film.  Using a movie in a movie
technique that plays the first film for laughs.  I wish Craven had used
more of STAB for laughs.  There are some pretty funny moments in STAB,
including a hilarious cameo by Tori Spelling.
Scream 2 is definitely a sequel that does not suck.  Craven and Williamson
have done a great job with this movie and it is admirable that they can mix
the thriller with an outright self-mocking comedy without losing the edge.
They are able to scare us one second then make us laugh out loud the next.
This is a fun, scary, and humorous film that shouldn't be missed in the
theatre.  It will have you on the edge of your seat for most of the film.
Don't miss Scream 2.

Author
David Wilcock
(MIRAMAX)
RUNNING TIME: 122 MINUTES (2 HOURS 2 MINUTES)
STARRING DAVID ARQUETTE, NEVE CAMPBELL, COURTENEY COX AND JAMIE KENNEDY
DIRECTED BY WES CRAVEN
After Scream (1996) managed to pull in an over $100 million gross, it would
seem obvious that a sequel would eventually arrive. And it's arrived quickly
aswell. Wes Craven and screenwriter Kevin Wiliamson saw they were on a good
thing, as just as Scream (1996) is enjoying success on video, the sequel,
the imaginatively titled Scream 2 comes slashing onto our screens. And while
Scream 2 has got a bigger body count, and a fair amount of jump scenes, this
film is never as enjoyable as you would expect it to be.
The film opens with two college kids at the opening night of the new horror
flick that has just opened, 'Stab', based on a book written by Gale Weathers
(Cox) about the happenings in the original Scream. A nice twist is that all
the audience members are wearing the 'Scream' mask which was the killers
trademark in Scream, so when the two college kids are viciously killed in
the cinema, the amount of culprits is overwhelming. The news of the killing
reaches Sidney Prescott (Campbell), one of the survivors from the prequel,
and when Casey 'Cici' Cooper it killed by a guy in a 'Scream' mask, it looks
as though the killings are starting all over again. Prescott, along with
Weathers, Randy Meeks (Kennedy), and Dewey Riley (Arquette) join together to
find out who's performing the killings.
For a spoof, Scream 2 takes itself awfully seriously. The death scenes
aren't funny, if anything that actually quite nasty. Scream 2 seems to poke
fun at all the clichés in horror movies, then pulls off a whole load of
clichés itself. Most of the time, it's pretty obvious what's going to happen
next. Also, because the killer is a normal person, not some supernatural
monster (like Freddy Kruegar) there's only a limit to what the killer can
do, so most of the deaths are pretty boring (and as said above, strangely
nasty.) The characters are also meant to be horror movie fans, and know the
tricks of the horror movie trade, but some of the things they do are
surprisingly stupid. For example, Campbell is stuck in a car with the
unconscious killer. Instead of shooting him with a gun that's close to her,
and then unmasking the killer, she goes out a window, and runs to a deserted
theater, leaving the killer free to escape (when she/he wakes up) and chase
her.
Although the story may be flawed, the performances are fun, and the dialogue
is funny. There's in-jokes about the movies, and there's also a funny scene
where Randy and Dewey are discussing the culprits (although you've probably
already seen this clip in the trailers.) While the scare scenes rely more on
the killer popping out from nowhere and loud music suddenly playing, there's
some suspenseful scenes, such as when Gale is being chased around a sound
studio, and the first five minutes. But you don't feel scared throughout,
and most of the time it's obvious when the killer is going to show itself,
the film is so clinched.
Wes Craven directs well enough, he handles the jump scenes well, and he
isn't too bad with the 'serious' bits either. Kevin Wiliamson script,
although predictable, is fun, and the film zips along like some demonic
roller coaster. Two hours is a bit long for a horror movie though, and the
ending is weak, and stretched out far too long (and, again, is entirely
predictable.) The soundtrack is good, although if you've seen Broken Arrow
(1996), the music will sound very familiar (the film uses the Broken Arrow
soundtrack.)
In Scream 2, there's a scene where a film class is discussing whether
sequels are better than the originals. Randy points out that the prequel is
always better. In the case of Scream and Scream 2, his argument is correct.
OVERALL RATING= *** OUT OF  *****
REVIEW BY DAVID WILCOCK
Š1998 David Wilcock
 DAVID WILCOCK
david.wilcock@btinternet.com
Visit the Wilcock Movie Page!
http://wilcockmovie.home.ml.org -OR-
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/9061
Recieve Wilcock Movie Page Reviews via E-MAIL
Send a blank E-MAIL to wmp-reviews-subscribe@makelist.com to
join the mailing list!

Author
Michael J. Legeros
     The fact that I survived a packed preview at the stinky Six Forks--
with a few hundred gabby teens and not a damn bit of hi-fi sound to
drown 'em out-- is an accomplishment unto itself.  Too bad the film
wasn't better.  SCREAM 2 is a hip, hair-raising, self-referential snore.
Series' creators Wes Craven (director) and Kevin Williamson (writer)
have relocated their smash franchise ($39M!) to a sleepy college town,
where the survivors of the first film (Neve Campbell, David Arquette,
Courtney Cox, etc.) are being stalked by a copycat killer.  (In the in-
spired but overlong opening, the killer makes his/her debut at a rauc-
ous, ROCKY HORROR--like premiere of STAB, a movie based on the book
based on the fictional events of the first film.)  Though the number of
in-jokes ends up far higher than any body count, the boo bits are act-
ually the *more* successful component of the movie.  Only intermittenly
does Williamson's script crackle with enough electric wit to make you
forget that you're watching a bunch of good-looking bad actors being put
through the standard slasher motions.  (Or, in the case of the godawful
ending, an apparent live-action update of "Scooby Doo, Where Are You?")
With Omar Epps, Rebecca Gayheart, Sarah Michelle Gellar, Jamie Kennedy,
Laurie Metcalf, Jerry O'Connell, Jada Pinkett, Liev Schreiber, and play-
ing Drew Barrymore in the opening of STAB, Rollergirl herself, Heather
Graham.

Author
Michael Redman
The return to the popular spoof of slasher films had the biggest December
opening weekend in history and, in accordance with one of the rules of
sequels, features an even higher body count.
Like its predecessor, there are some clever lines (a sorority girl offers "Hi!
No, I really mean it! Hi!") and send-ups of the genre. My favorites are the
scenes where the unarmed would-be victims rush around trying to find the
vicious killer. What are they going to do if they find him?
Despite the witty antics, the film doesn't have much entertainment value for
me. Why? I dunno. Perhaps it's because the characters don't hold much
interest. Or maybe the fact that the same scene is played out over and over
enters into it.
It could be that I don't have enough of a background of slasher films to enjoy
a parody. I guess that's not such a bad thing.
[This appeared in the 12/18/97 "Bloomington Voice", Bloomington, Indiana.
Michael Redman can be reached at redman@bvoice.com ]
-- 
mailto:redman@bvoice.com
This week's film review at http://www.bvoice.com/
Film reviews archive at http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Michael%20Redman

Author
James Berardinelli
Cast: Neve Campbell, Courtney Cox, David Arquette, Jamie Kennedy, 
      Liev Schreiber, Jada Pinkett, Sarah Michelle Gellar, 
      Laurie Metcalf, Omar Epps, Jerry O'Connell, Timothy Olyphant
Director: Wes Craven
Producers: Cathy Konrad, Marianne Maddalena
Screenplay: Kevin Williamson
Cinematography: Peter Deming
Music: Marco Beltrami, Danny Elfman ("Cassandra")
U.S. Distributor: Dimension Films
     SCREAM 2 isn't quite as clever as its predecessor, but it fills the 
gap with a cutting wit.  Death -- even gruesome, bloody death -- can be 
funny if handled the right way (some will be offended by this statement, 
but you need look no further than PULP FICTION for an example).  And, 
while there's plenty of horror to go around in SCREAM 2, the latest '90s 
slasher flick incarnation, there are also a few laughs to be had.  
SCREAM 2 is a slice-and-dice movie for those who don't take their horror 
too seriously.
     The success of the original SCREAM took everyone in the industry by 
surprise.  The unexpected blockbuster, whose gross soared over the $100 
million mark during its six month release window, opened just about a 
year ago and turned into one of the most profitable horror films of all 
time.  A sequel was inevitable; fortunately, nearly the entire creative 
team has returned for SCREAM 2, including director Wes Craven, 
screenwriter Kevin Williamson, and actors Neve Campbell, Courtney Cox, 
David Arquette, Jamie Kennedy, and Liev Schreiber.
     As stipulated by one of the "rules of sequels" uttered by a movie-
obsessed character in the film, the body count in SCREAM 2 is higher 
than that in the original.  Paradoxically, there's a lot less gore.  
There is blood, of course, but nothing excessive by slasher-movie 
standards, and there are no depictions of spilled entrails.  Craven has 
remembered that scares are more important that graphic displays of human 
insides and bodily fluids.  A second strength of SCREAM 2 is that it 
features a gallery of legitimate characters rather than a group of 
cardboard cut-out stereotypes lined up for slaughter.  After all, we've 
known some of these people for two movies -- it's almost impossible not 
to care about them at least a little.
     SCREAM 2 opens approximately two years after the original.  As in 
the first picture, there's a slick, self-mocking prologue.  This time, 
the victims are Jada Pinkett and Omar Epps, whose characters are 
visiting a local theater for a preview screening of the movie STAB 
(which is based on the "true life" events of SCREAM).  Some of the 
smartest dialogue comes during this sequence as Pinkett bemoans the lack 
of African American participation in horror films (it's surely no 
coincidence that, in addition to Pinkett and Epps, SCREAM 2 features two 
black characters).  Shortly thereafter, she and her boyfriend have been 
gutted, signaling the beginning of a series of copycat murders.
     Craven lets loose a burst of tongue-in-cheek creativity for the 
"movie within a movie" sequences.  They give him an opportunity to 
openly parody SCREAM -- an act that he accomplishes with great panache.  
STAB features Heather Graham in the "Casey Becker" role (played in the 
original by Drew Barrymore) and Tori Spelling as "Sidney Prescott" (Neve 
Campbell).  Sadly, we only see a couple of scenes from STAB.  It would 
have been a little more fun, I think, had Craven used Joe Dante's 
approach from MATINEE and shown lengthy excerpts from his satirical 
production.
     Following the prologue, we are re-introduced to Sidney Prescott, 
who has left her sleepy hometown to go to Windsor College.  Her friend 
Randy (Jamie Kennedy) is a student there as well, and he's just as 
knowledgeable about horror films as ever.  Once the double murder at 
STAB becomes big news, the media converges on Windsor, looking to 
interview the original victim.  At the head of the flock of vultures is 
Gale Weathers (Courtney Cox), who has a little surprise for Sidney.  She 
has brought Cotton Weary (Liev Schreiber), the man Sidney falsely 
accused of murder, with her.  Also arriving at the college is Deputy 
Dewey (David Arquette), who is there to act as a big brother to Sidney 
during this latest round of tribulations.
     In addition to the survivors from the original SCREAM, the field of 
potential victims is well-populated.  There's a blond co-ed named Cece 
(Sarah Michelle Gellar, who has now appeared in two of Williamson's 
movies -- this one and I KNOW WHAT YOU DID LAST SUMMER); Sidney's 
requisite boyfriend, Derek (Jerry O'Connell); a local newswoman (Laurie 
Metcalf); Gale's new cameraman (Duane Martin); a British drama teacher 
(David Warner); and several sorority sisters and would-be sorority 
sisters (Portia De Rossi, Rebecca Gayheart, Elise Neal, Marisol 
Nichols).  Ultimately, there are lots of attractive corpses.
     From the STAB scenes to lines like "Brothers don't last long in 
situations like this," Craven and Williamson are clearly having a lot of 
fun with SCREAM 2, and the movie is enjoyable, if a little overlong (the 
livelier first hour is better than the second).  Their resolution to the 
obligatory "whodunit?" is less of a letdown than it could be, and 
knowingly offers a wink and nod at past unmasking scenes.  ("Nice 
twist," quips the killer.  "Didn't see it coming, didya?")  One senses, 
however, that, by the end of this picture, the overall concept of a hip, 
self-referential slasher film has been played out.  Supposedly, there's 
going to be a SCREAM 3, but, if the film makers don't come up with 
something radical, we could end up with a classic case of sequel 
overkill.
Now with more than 1300 reviews...
The ReelViews web site: http://movie-reviews.colossus.net/
"No art passes our conscience in the way film does, and goes directly to our
feelings, deep down into the dark rooms of our souls"

Author
Martijn van Turnhout
De HTML-versie:
http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Boulevard/8429/23.html
"Scream" uit 1996 was een revolutionaire horrorfilm, die het
horror-genre weer deed opleven. De schrijver Kevin Williamson, expert op
het gebied van films, maakte handig gebruik van filmclichés om zo een
slim, origineel en grappig verhaal in elkaar te zetten. De hoofdpersonen
hadden alle horrorfilms al gezien en kenden eigenlijk dus de regels van
het spel. Met zo'n verhaal werd "Scream", gecombineerd met vakman Wes
Craven, een wereldwijd succes. Nu is er "Scream 2", de film waarin het
draait om de sequels. Zuigen ze of zuigen ze niet? 
Er zijn twee jaren verstreken na de gebeurtenissen in "Scream".
TV-reporter Gale Weathers (Courteney Cox), destijds ook aanwezig, heeft
een boek over de moorden geschreven, genaamd "The Woodsboro Murders".
Het boek is een succes en er wordt besloten een film van te maken, wat
dus uiteindelijk "Stab" wordt. De voorpremičre van "Stab" verloopt niet
goed, want al snel vallen er een paar doden, waarvan er eentje middenin
de bioscoopzaal vermoord wordt. Dat slachtoffer weet nog net naar het
bioscoopdoek te kruipen om zo iedereen met haar dood te confronteren. 
Gale Weathers en Sidney Prescott (Neve Campbell) hebben het al in de
gaten: de moorden beginnen opnieuw. De seriemoordenaar gaat ermee door,
want op het schoolterrein vallen nu ook al de nodige doden. Prescott
weet dat hij snel achter haar zal aankomen en neemt dus een paar
maatregelen. Ondertussen ontdekt Weathers een verband tussen de moorden
die nu gepleegd worden en vroeger gepleegd werden. Samen met Dewey Riley
(David Arquette), nu een lijfwacht, gaat ze op onderzoek uit. 
Je kunt zien dat regisseur Wes Craven gebruik heeft kunnen maken van een
groter budget. In plaats van telefoons gebruikt nu iedereen natuurlijk
GSM's, de bloedscčnes zijn nu nog bloederiger en de locaties
uitgebreider. "Scream 2" ziet er in ieder geval beter en verzorgder uit
dan z'n voorganger. Ook zijn er een paar TV-sterren bijgekomen, zoals
Jerry O'Connell (de briljante Quinn uit 'Sliders') en Laurie Metcalf (de
neurotische zus van Roseanne uit 'Roseanne'). 
Net als in "Scream" is de beginscčne van "Scream 2" briljant en zeer
goed in beeld gebracht, waarin nu ook een erg leuke discussie is over de
rol van zwarte mensen in horrorfilms. Een prachtig begin van een film,
als je het mij vraagt. Craven laat zien dat de moordenaar gebruik maakt
van de hysterie rondom "Stab" en de bijbehorende kostuums. Jada Pinkett,
de zwarte vrouw die in de bioscoop vermoord wordt, is overigens in het
echte leven de vriendin van Will Smith. 
Er zijn zoveel dingen in "Scream 2" waar je van kan genieten. De
levendige discussies over sequels bijvoorbeeld. Of de ironie en frisse
dialogen van Williamson, de twee dingen waar hij bekend om staat. Ook de
griezel- en bloedscčnes zijn weer meesterlijk in beeld gebracht door
expert Craven, waarvan het begin en de climax toch wel de allerbeste
zijn. Deze film moet je dus gewoon zien. Een piepklein (maar dan ook
microscopisch klein) minpuntje van "Scream 2" is dat de
telefoongesprekken nu wel overbekend zijn. Voortaan telefooncellen
gebruiken? 
And you can find my film reviews at
http://us.imdb.com/M/reviews_by?Martijn+van+Turnhout

Author
Doug Skiles
Starring: Neve Campbell (Sidney Prescott), Courteney Cox (Gale
Weathers), David Arquette (Dewey Riley), Jamie Kennedy (Randy Meeks),
Sarah Michelle Gellar (Cici Cooper), Jerry O'Connell (Derek), Liev
Schreiber (Cotton Weary), Elise Neal (Hallie), Jada Pinkett (Maureen),
Laurie Metcalf (Debbie Salt), Duane Martin (Joel), Timothy Olyphant
(Mickey), Omar Epps (Paul Stevens)
Directed by: Wes Craven, Written by: Kevin Williamson
Rated R by the MPAA for blood and gore, strong language, and some sexual
references
Alright, let's talk horror flicks.  Or, more specifically, horror
sequels.  They suck.  You, I, or anybody could write a cheesy
1980s-style horror sequel.  Just remember all the key ingredients: an
attractive group of horny teenagers to kill off, an unstoppable
murderer, and lots of scenes where things pop out unexpectedly while
accompanied by loud noises (referred to as "jump scenes" by those in the
know).
Now let's talk SCREAM.  It came out almost exactly one year ago, to a
less-than-stellar opening weekend gross.  But word of mouth spread, and
in the end SCREAM made more than 100 million dollars here in the US of
A.  It's still praised by many overzealous teens and gen-xers as being
one of the great films of our (or any) time.  This basically functions
to make it one of the most overrated movies of all time.  It was pretty
fun for what it was, which is a shocker since most horror flicks
*aren't* nowadays, and the opening scene was honestly chilling
(something most movies can't pull off).  The comedic aspect of the film
was what made it most entertaining, as it worked much better than the
majority of the horror angle.  It even had some great characters (Jamie
Kennedy's film geek "Randy Meeks" will always be treasured).  But it
also had a few *major* flaws.  The main character, Sidney Prescott
(played by Neve Campbell) was probably the worst character in the
movie.  She pulled a lot of stupid stunts like having sex with a guy and
then, afterwards, telling him that she still suspected he was the
killer.  Oh, so she didn't care about her feelings that he could be a
mass murderer, she was just out to get laid?  Aside from her bad traits,
she basically *had* no personality, leaving us a female lead who was
essentially an obnoxious and annoying little bitch/slut.  Another
problem with the movie was the KEVIN WILLIAMSON CURSE (TM), or KWC. 
This is the problem with pretty much all films that are thus far written
by Kevin Williamson which makes it so that likable characters are often
killed off and the most easy-to-hate ones (like Sidney) tend to make it
to the finale.  When that happens, you just stop caring.  How can the
supposedly tense ending be tense at all when you want the main character
to just get what she deserves anyway?  The KWC (tm) is apparent in
various forms in SCREAM, his original treatment for HALLOWEEN 7, and
now, in SCREAM 2 (I'm told by a number of sources that he did it again
in I KNOW WHAT YOU DID LAST SUMMER, and once again damaged the movie by
it, but since I haven't seen that movie yet, I can't be certain).  It
really makes you wonder what kind of friends this guy has that he feels
the need to make the heros of his stories obnoxious human beings and
then kills off all the nice ones.  Anyway, despite all this, SCREAM was
still fairly fun, especially in its references to other horror films and
its attempts to do away with their old cliches, and it did leave enough
of the likable people alive in the end to make it finally all add up to
being about a *** film.  Nothing overly special, but definitely
something worth seeing.
Okay, now, let's talk SCREAM 2.  Basically, you're getting more of the
same here.  The story is that the survivors of the first film come
together along with their friends when a copycat killer appear in
Sidney's college town.  This happens just as "Stab," the movie based on
the book that Gale Weathers (Courtney Cox) wrote about the first movie's
killings, premieres (providing us with some cute in-jokes for those who
saw the first one - Tori Spelling, anyone?)  Overall, the comedy is
actually stronger than it was in the original for about the first half
of the film, but the horror (at least what there was of it) is actually
somewhat lessened.  There's no scene that compares to the opening of the
last one that just sets your nerves on edge.  In fact, characters in
this movie don't simply mock horror cliches, some of them perpetuate
them!  For example, hasn't anyone been taught *not* to run up the stairs
when you could run out the door?  Didn't Sidney point out how foolish
this is in the first film?  Still, there are scenes that have more
tension than their closest counterparts in the original had.
Now I'll be straight for a minute here.  I read the script for SCREAM 2
a month or two ago, and I must admit, it was mostly pretty strong.  It
would've been downright excellent if not for a few things - an extreme
case of the KWC (tm) and an ending which was so positively horrid that
it came close to ruining the entire rest of the story.  Now, in light of
the movie, let's deal with these problems.  This flick's been changed
quite a bit.  The ending is different, and I do believe it's better. 
But it's still not great.  It's way too "Scooby-Doo."  You just wait for
the killer(s) to say "And I would've gotten away with it too, if not for
you meddling kids!" or something to that effect.  Anyway, because the
ending is different, many scenes earlier in the film had to be altered,
and some of the more dramatic ones seem less tense than they were in the
script.  However, if you want to view these scenes in light of *only*
the movie itself, which is probably the smart way to go, then these two
or maybe three scenes still do have tension and are still moderately
strong in that sense.  Okay folks.  Now let's deal with the KWC...
I'm getting worried about Williamson.  He comes close to making SCREAM
and SCREAM 2 into being almost *great* movies, but this KWC (tm) causes
severe damage.  It really kills him.  It's what sucks him down from
making "films" or "movies" to making "flicks."  Somebody's got to teach
this guy to have some common sense.  SCREAM 2 has got the worst case of
KWC (tm) that I could've imagined.  He manages to kill off the one
character who was probably *THE* most likable one in the movie, a
character who could've stuck with the viewers and loved for years to
come if not for this act of pure idiocy.  What purpose does it serve?  I
supposed you might be able to argue that it makes the later tense scenes
more effective, giving the viewer a feeling of "well if they killed that
person off, anyone could be next!" But that just doesn't cut it.  The
audience on opening night where I saw it here in St. Louis didn't
exactly feel the tension.  The reaction was primarily a large collection
of profanity from the primarily late teens/early 20s group.  Shouts like
"What is THAT s---?!", "F--- YOU, CRAVEN!!!" and yes, even "Williamson
will BURN for that sick s---, THE LITTLE F----R!!!" were rather common. 
Well, at least you can say that Williamson *did* get an emotional
reaction from his audience.  But, for God's sake man, do you think that
*now* you'll learn that people don't want to see their favorite
character bite it? 
Well once this character died, the humor in the movie just about died
with him/her.  Comedic moments got kind of rare without his/her jokes
and insights.  There were occasional ones, but just not as many and
certainly not as good as you got from him/her.  The greatest moment of
humor after that came when the killer(s) was/were revealed.  Can you say
cheesy?  When the audience saw who was responsible for our little trip
into flick-land, the initial response was widespread laughter.  I've
checked on the reaction at other showings in other theaters, and it was
pretty much the same.  At my own showing, shouts once again came out of
the crowd, like "I don't even know who the F--- THAT IS!!!" and "It's
SCOOBY-F---ING-DOO!!!" Yes, I feel that the choice for who the killer(s)
was/were was a pretty goofy one.  And yet, it was certainly better than
the choice(s) in the original script, by quite a lot.  And of course,
this final scene is also not exactly tense, since we don't care much
about these characters.  
Overall, I think that the ending and the KWC (tm), along with the loss
in comedic quality as a result of that KWC act, knocks this film down to
a level below the original.  Neither is an excellent film in any sense -
these are glorified B movies people, pure and simple.  But the first was
probably the more fun.  At least Sidney doesn't do anything as bad in
this movie as what she did in the first movie, but the thing is, she
just plain *doesn't do much* anyway.  We don't get that much of an
insight into her character.  The closest we get is seeing that she tries
to remain strong despite what's going on again around her (ultimately,
she basically fails).  Sidney does get one of the (unintentionally)
funnier scenes though, when her college acting coach (she's a drama
major it seems) tells her what a good actress she is, prompting Neve
Campbell to do a bit of... questionable acting which the professor
actually approves of.  This was another scene that got a good amount of
laughs at the showing I attended on opening night.
Overall, I guess SCREAM 2 will be enjoyed by those who liked the
original.  It's moderately close to the first one in quality, despite
its glaring flaws.  In a world where horror movies and particularly
horror sequels suck, this is certainly above most sequels in the genre. 
Still, the comedy aspects of both these movies is stronger than its
horror angle.  Perhaps the third and (hopefully) final installment can
emphasize the humor more?  And maybe Kevin Williamson can prove to us
that he's not a hack by fighting off his curse.  In the end, SCREAM 2 is
fun for those who attend who like these kinds of movies, like the
original, or just attend a crowded screening with people who aren't
afraid to voice their opinions.  If you didn't care for the first one or
can't see it with many people... well, you're probably better off
checking out the latest exploits of Ellen Ripley or James Bond to get
your sequel fix.
Oh, my new rating system (which hopefully will work) just rates a movie
based on its overall quality (expectations no longer factor in).  It's
purely star based, with four stars most likely being the higest (I might
make it go to five someday if I change my mind) and zero beings the
lowest.  That being said, I give SCREAM 2...

Author
John Sylva
SCREAM 2 by DeWyNGaLe (John Sylva)    Rating: A
In 1996, Scream took moviegoers by storm, giving them a new type of film to
enjoy and look forward to.  The slasher genre was reborn, and a new generation
was introduced to the popular 80s film type.  Many were skeptical about a
sequel to the classic film, saying that the entire horror genre was destroyed
by sequels, and if a sequel to a great one was released, it would ruin it once
again.  That's not the case with the worthy sequel Scream 2 though.  
Neve Campbell reprises her role as Sidney Prescott, now a student at Windsor
College, a nice school in southern Ohio.  She has moved on from the terror the
occurred when she lived in Woodsboro, California, where her mother, and a
various amount of friends were murdered by a killer dressed in a black robe and
a ghostface mask.  Since the events two years ago, survivor Gale Weathers,
played by the returning Courteney Cox, has written a book based on the events
that she experienced, called The Woodsboro Murders.  Much to Sidney's
disliking, a movie based on the popular book has been made, called "Stab." 
After the murders start occurring once again, Dewey, another survivor from the
original makes his way from California to Ohio to protect Sidney.  Along with
Dewey, Sidney's friendly roommate Hallie, played by the lesser known Elise
Neal.  She is the most likable character in the movie, and Neal makes you feel
for her character, especially when she comes face to face with Mr. Ghostface.  
Also attending Sidney's college is survivor Randy Meeks, played by the funny
Jamie Kennedy.  Now that all of the survivors are together once again,
including Gale Weathers, the killer has them right where they want them.  The
killer begins copying what Billy Loomis and Stu Macher, the killers from the
original, accomplished two years ago, only this time they want Sidney, Dewey,
Gale, and Randy dead.  The killer ends up going beyond the point where they
just want to kill the surviving foursome, killing anyone that they have a
problem with or that gets in their way.
Compared to the original, Scream 2 lives up in almost every way. One key point
that didn't live up, which hurt the overall effect, to the original was the
opening sequence.  In the original, (spoiler) Casey Becker, played wonderfully
by Drew Barrymore, was murdered while getting ready to watch a movie in her
very own home.  Scream 2 tries to copycat the original, making another
horrifying opening scene, but falls short in predictability. (End spoiler)  
Throw together Neve Campbell, Sarah Michelle Gellar, Jerry O'Connell, Jada
Pinkett, Jamie Kennedy, Courteney Cox, and David Arquette, and you get one of
the best teen casts you could ever ask for.  Neve Campbell and Sarah Michelle
Gellar's names alone will bring hundreds of teenagers to the movie, wanting to
see their teen idols.  Just because Scream 2 appeals to teens, and mostly
teens, that doesn't mean it isn't a high quality film.  It's amazing what an
actor can do when you throw a killer with a knife at them.  For that two hours
the film lasts, Neve Campbell and company become different people, and you feel
like you are watching real beings, not characters that were created by Kevin
Williamson's imaginative mind.  Especially in the eerie movie theater scene, I
felt a little like I was in the movie myself.
The entire premise of the film is that sequels are bad movies, but Wes Craven
made a film about sequels being bad without actually making the movie bad. 
Writer Kevin Williamson must have had a lot of courage to write a screenplay
this edgy.  Speaking of Williamson, he is becoming one of today's best known
movie scribes.  After penning the marvelous Scream and Scream 2, I Know What
You Did Last Summer, The Faculty, and the upcoming Teaching Mrs. Tingle, he
should become a legend.  I felt that in Scream 2, Williamson tried a little bit
too hard to make it as good as the original, where he didn't need to at all.
On the edge of your seat is where you will be while viewing Scream 2, because
the suspense level is much greater than in the original.  More chase scenes,
more hiding scenes, and yes- more gore.  Scream 2 lowers the level of the
original on pop outs, which is disappointing, but the chase scenes are very
memorable.  Unfortunately, Scream 2 falls to the predictability level at some
points, as many slasher films do.  Those trailers gave away a little too much
if you can piece it all together.
Scream 2 will open up the door for the slasher genre even more.  It already has
somewhat, with films being released such as Halloween : H20, Urban Legend, I
Still Know What You Did Last Summer, among many others.  All of these have been
worthy horror films, but they are starting to go downhill.  Let's hope Scream
3, which will be in theaters December 10th, will revive my faith in brilliant
horror films. 
The Bottom Line- Keep us screaming Neve! 

Author
David Sunga
Starring: 
Neve Campbell, Courteney Cox, David Arquette, Laurie Metcalf, Jerry
O'Connell, Timothy Olyphant, Liev Schreiber
Ingredients: 
Slasher at large. Whodunit mystery that spoofs the horror genre. Young,
hip, heroes who spout pop culture witticisms.
Synopsis: 
This fun movie is the sequel to SCREAM (1996), a gore spoof and slasher
parody which pitted heroes Neve Campbell, Courtney Cox, and David
Arquette against an anonymous, masked movie enthusiast/marauder whose
murderous style was based on horror genre cliches. Since SCREAM 2 picks
up where the original SCREAM left off, let's take a moment to remember
the original. In SCREAM the running gag is that the mysterious masked
killer always follows film cliches, but luckily the killer's prey are
movie buffs who try to predict the killer's next move based on the same
cliches. High school girl Sidney Prescott (Neve Campbell) is stalked by
the movie enthusiast/killer. But she turns the tables, and tries to
solve the mystery of her masked stalker's identity. Also in on the hunt
is sleazy, catty, tabloid reporter Gail Weathers (Courteney Cox), and
lawman Deputy Dewey Riley, (David Arquette) a baby-faced, inept
investigator. In SCREAM 2, Director Wes Craven and Writer Kevin
Williamson team up again to create another whodunit that follows the
further adventures of hapless SCREAM characters Sidney, Gail, and Dewey.
This time, Sidney is a theater student in a college town when a series
of SCREAM copycat murders occurs. Sidney becomes the next most probable
victim. Soon enough she is joined by reporter Gail and friend Dewey, and
they all try to figure who the new masked slasher is. The problem is,
people keep conveniently arriving just as the masked attacker leaves, or
leaving just before the killer appears, making everyone a possible
suspect. Sidney and friends trade hip and witty barbs about movie and
pop culture trivia as they wrack their brains trying to figure out the
killer's pattern. Who is the slasher really? The boyfriend? Another film
student? Gail, Dewey, Sidney, the roommate, the sorority girls, the
cops, the recently released jailbird, or an unknown wacko? Find out. 
Opinion:
The thing about any sequel is the question: "Is it as good as the
original?" In this case the answer is yes. If you liked SCREAM, then
chances are, youll think that SCREAM 2 is at least in the same
ballpark. One thing I like about SCREAM 2 is that it spends some time
developing the characters from SCREAM so that you come to know more
about them and like them. If you intend to see this movie, I highly
advise seeing SCREAM (on video) first, because SCREAM 2 assumes that you
remember all the characters and events of SCREAM. It can get slightly
confusing if youre not up on the original story. Here's an example: In
the original SCREAM, one of the characters talks about a movie being
made. "I see myself as sort of a young Meg Ryan. But with my luck, I'll
get Tori Spelling." In SCREAM 2, sure enough, the characters are
watching a movie called STAB, based on the events of SCREAM. Tori
Spelling plays the STAB actress!

Author
Scott Renshaw
     For what it's worth, I correctly guessed the identity of the killer
in SCREAM 2...well, sort of.  I suppose I should feel satisfied at my own
cleverness, since Dimension and the makers of SCREAM 2 have put so much
effort into keeping that piece of information secret.  Even more so than
in the original SCREAM, writer Kevin Williamson goes to ridiculous
extremes to keep the audience guessing whodunnit, so ridiculous that the
film becomes too focused on the one thing which should have been least
important.  As a horror film, it's a solid piece of work; as a satire,
it's frequently hilarious.  As a mystery, it tries way, way, _way_ too
hard.
     SCREAM 2 takes place two years after the events of the original, just
in time for Hollywood to cash in on the Woodsboro High murders.  The
non-fiction book by reporter Gale Weathers (Courteney Cox) has become a
popular horror film called "Stab," which in turn appears to have generated
a copycat killer.  When two college students turn up dead at the film's
premiere, Sidney Prescott (Neve Campbell) once again begins to fear for
her life.  Other Woodsboro survivors like Dewey Riley (David Arquette) and
video-store-clerk-turned-film-student Randy Meeks (Jamie Kennedy) offer
support, but bodies continue to turn up at an alarming rate.  Who could
the killer be?  Sidney's boyfriend Derek (Jerry O'Connell)?  Cotton Weary
(Liev Schreiber), the man Sidney once wrongly accused of murder?  Gale's
cameraman Joel (Duane Martin)?  Film student Mickey (Timothy Olyphant)?
Reporter Debbie Salt (Laurie Metcalf)?   Gale?  Dewey?  Randy?  Jermaine?
Marlon?  Tito?
     If you can keep the suspects straight without a press kit, more power
to you.  Williamson often seems so concerned with turning every live body
in sight into a potential suspect that he lets that question overwhelm
everything else.  When the characters aren't busy trying to survive the
night, they're either sitting around trying to figure out who the killer
is or _running_ around trying to figure out who the killer is.  It all
builds to a revelatory climax drawn out so long past the point of
diminishing returns -- loaded with confessions, motives and false finishes
-- that you can't even see the point of diminishing returns from there.
     I'm being a bit harder on SCREAM 2 than it might deserve, because
that one big problem may be the only real problem.  Williamson's satirical
darts are expertly targeted, not just at horror film cliches or the
"inevitable inferiority" of sequels, but at the original film itself.  The
film-within-a-film "Stab" provides a few wonderful moments, as do the
audience reactions to some of the more improbable situations (e.g. "Hang
up the phone and Star-69 his a**").  The dialogue is sharp, smart and not
at all afraid of naming names (Cox's "Friends" co-stars David Schwimmer
and Jennifer Aniston are among those skewered), a perfect counter-point to
Wes Craven's crafty suspense scenes.  If you're not ready to crawl out of
your skin when Campbell crawls across the unconscious form of her
tormentor, it's time for a pulse check.
     SCREAM 2 is so entertaining both as a chiller and as a chuckler that
the lack of attention to those elements is a frustration.  Kevin
Williamson is carving out a new genre for himself which certainly seems to
be finding an audience -- both SCREAMs and I KNOW WHAT YOU DID LAST SUMMER
take off with the radical notion that umasking the monster is a good idea.
There's just something deflating about a tense, comic horror film that
turns into a Scooby-Doo episode.  Williamson has too much talent as a
writer of comedy to keep getting side-tracked by conventions, even if
they're conventions he's helping to re-create.  Scare us or make us
laugh...we know you can do both.  Just keep the Mystery Machine parked at
the curb.

Author
Ted Prigge
Director: Wes Craven
Writer: Kevin Williamson
Starring: Neve Campbell, Courteney Cox, David Arquette, Jamie Kennedy,
Jerry O'Connell, Liev Schreiber, Duane Martin, Sarah Michelle Gellar,
Tim Olyphant, Elise Neal, Laurie Metcalf, Jada Pinkett, Omar Epps, Lewis
Arquette, David Warner, Rebecca Gayheart, Heather Graham, Tori Spelling,
Luke Wilson
"Scream 2" is kind of an oxymoron in itself: it's a film which looked
good because it mocked sequels, but was also a sequel.  Talk about
hypocrisy.  Now, the first one also had a similar fallacy: believing
that horror movies suck, but hell, it's a horror movie, but it worked
awesomely, and brought back the slasher genre in a cool, hip 90s kinda
way, without getting all alternatively whiny or anything.  "Scream 2"
wishes it were as cool as the original.
"Scream 2" picks up two years after the first one ended, where a killer
(or killers) killed a bunch of teens, but was ultimately stopped.  The
chief survivors of the first film - protagonist Sydney (Neve Campbell),
obsessive journalist Gale Weathers (Courteney Cox, now with admittingly
kinda attractive streaks in her hair), boyish yet lovable Deputy Dewey
(David Arquette, with a punctured nerve from the original, causing him
to limp and hold one arm out like he was Bob Dole), and dorky film geek
guy (not me) Randy (Jamie Kennedy, looking almost too cool with a
goatee) - well, they're all back.  And someone else is too.
Like the first one, we get an elaborate, satirical, and pretty bitching
opening sequence involving two collegiate lovers (Jada Pinkett and Omar
Epps) who attend a preview screening of the movie that was made from the
book that Gale wrote on the first one, "Stab," and are subsequently
murdered individually by a killer dressed in the mask from the first
one, which they're handing out at the door as Rocky Horror-esque
promotional advertisements.  Sure, it's cool as hell, but it's neither
as tense or clever as the first one, and didn't really have my adrenalin
pushing or anything.  Bad omen?
We then get two more hours of sometimes fun/sometimes not whodunit,
sorta/sorta not in the tradition of the first one.  There are some more
characters introduced, as it is two years later, and it's in college
where Randy and Sydney attend (did they do that on purpose...or is Randy
turning into Syd's own Hinkley?).  There's Syd's preppy fratboy
boyfriend, Derek (Jerry O'Connell, remember Joe from "Joe's
Apartment"...and that fat ass from "Stand By Me?"), two more film
students for fun (Tim Olyphant and Sarah Michelle Gellar), Syd's roomate
Hallie (Elsie Neal), an annoying journalist named Debbie Salt (Laurie
Metcalf, the sister from "Roseanne"), a freaked-out cameraman for Gale
who hasn't read her book yet (Duane Martin), among others.
Also back from the first is the man who we saw once or twice, and only
on TV in the first one: Cotton Weary (played by indie fave Liev
Schreiber).  This time, he actually has a whole bunch of lines, as he's
trying to get exposure so people will stop being afraid of him, and get
on with his life (there's a direct cause-and-effect if I ever saw one). 
Anyway, Liev rocks, giving possibly the best performance in the film.
The killings, obviously a result of a copycat, are pretty fun, even if
they are more elaborate.  Of course, Randy does a redo of his "How To
Survive a Horror Film" speech, modifying it slightly for sequels, and
one of is more blood and more elaborateness in general.  I respect that,
but one of the reasons the first one worked was the structure.  The film
was tightly scripted by Kevin Williamson, making it more satirical and
more fun.  It was a guessing game from start to finish.  This time,
there's some guessing, but most of the time I wasn't even caring. 
Probably because the big sequences were too distracting.
Yes, they're great, and I was having fun with a lot of them.  But they
don't really work well with the plot for some reason.  Take for example
a sequence that is brilliantly done but ultimately hurts the structure a
bit: Syd, a drama major, is playing, of all roles, Cassandra, and during
a rehearsal (with full special effects - this is obviously a utopian
college, I mean, the dorm rooms are gigantic), she starts hallucinating
that all the people with masks on are tying to kill her.  With a
brilliant score by Danny Elfman (who sadly only does this one scene),
it's scary, and with cool camerawork, it's effective.  But it's
distracting.  What does it have to do with the plot?  Nothing.  As do
most of them.
I do respect a lot of this film, though.  As I said, the film has some
great sequences (my favorite was the scene in the car - have to see
it...).  And there are some clever ways it makes characters look
suspicious, although not as well.  There are some genuine shocks, some
more character development (the whole Gale/Dewey thing, though never
really explained, is dealt with some more...and god help me if I wanted
them to get together), and some clever lines.
My big problem with reviewing this is the film comes back a lot towards
the end.  Although totally proposterous as to why it takes place where
it does, the ending is great, albeit extremely corny.  But, as a friend
said, how could it NOT be corny.  At least it plays it up for laughs,
and even tosses in some delicious satire.  Including some clever
afterthoughts, playing up the fact that it was contrived (it actually
made me happy), the ending is the most satisfying part of this.  I did
leave with a smile on my face, then I reflected on the film as a whole.
It's pretty much a mess.  With spots that shine here and there, the film
is very much a hills-and-valleys experience.  Sure, I liked the whole
take on sororities (with one of the lead sorority girls played by
Rebecca "I'm the Noxema Girl!" Gayheart), I dug the acting ('cept Laurie
Metcalf's), and even liked the set pieces, but could never really get
into them for some reason.  The original had me at the edge of my seat,
not because of the suspense, but the way it was done, but for some
reason I was left kinda cold by it all.  None of it really excited
me...even the cool ending...or the "I Think I Love You" singing by
Jerry.
Maybe the problem is that it wants to be so much.  It wants to be a
satire on media.  It wants to be a parody AND satire on sequels.  It
wants to clever, hip...I mean, it ends with a Collective Soul tune.  It
wants to have movie allusions (I spotted only a few, though, notably a
"Shining" reference), and it wants it all to be crammed into over two
hours.  The original was simple, yet it worked wonderfully.  I'm not
saying it's not great because it's no "Scream 1;" it wouldn't hold up
well on it's own anyway.  But of course, it's a sequel, damn proud of
it, and it never even works well when held up to the first one.
A special note should be made to the cool movie-within-a-movie, "Stab." 
It's one of the more inspired parts of the film, as it is overly corny,
and filled with heavy media attention.  At the premiere, the companies
send promotional costumes and glowing knives, adding to the cool
satire.  And the funniest part is it stars Heather Graham as Drew,
"Bottle Rocket"'s Luke Wilson as Skeet, and Tori Spelling as Neve (it is
also mentioned that David Schwimmer plays Dewey).  Too bad it isn't
really dealt with in any deeper fashion, as it could have added to the
overall greatness of the film.
"Scream 2" is not a major disappointment; a mere minor one.  It needs
tighter scripting, that's all.  I did laugh, I did jump a couple times,
and I even smiled a lot of the time.  But the overall feeling, once
reflecting on it, is a tad unsatisfied.  Oh well.  We always have
"Scream 3" - already in the making!
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Author
Michael Dequina
Rushed into production mere months after the release of the blockbuster
original, Scream 2 appears, in theory, to be no different than the quickie
slasher sequels it lampoons.  But Wes Craven's smart, self-referential
Scream was unlike any other splatterfest, and now that film has developed
into a most intriguing and unconventional horror franchise with the release
of this followup--an exciting and wonderfully witty romp that manages to
add some luster to the much-maligned concept of "sequel."
Scream 2 is an even more satiric film than its predecessor, and this tone
is established quickly with the opening scene.  Windsor College students
Maureen Evans (Jada Pinkett) and Phil Stevens (Omar Epps) attend a sneak
preview of the new horror movie Stab, which, as it turns out, is based on
the Windsboro, California murder spree depicted in the original film.  So
we see a hilariously letter-perfect recreation of Scream's now-classic
prologue, with a short-wigged Heather Graham assuming Drew Barrymore's role
as a Jiffy Pop-making blonde being terrorized over the phone by a
movie-obsessed psycho.  The restaging of the scene in and of itself would
be sufficiently satiric for most writers, but screenwriter Kevin Williamson
(who also penned the original) goes the extra mile, having Maureen vocally
mock its conventions ("Star-69 his ass!").  As smart and fun as Scream was,
it certainly had its share of cheesy aspects, and it is refreshing--not to
mention surprising and brave--to see Williamson and Craven poke fun at
their original film to such mercilessly hilarious effect.  This
movie-based-on-the-first-movie-within-its-sequel conceit, which is
revisited sporadically throughout the film (a highlight is Owen Wilson's
dead-on impresonation of Skeet Ulrich's slacker "cool" in a later scene),
perfectly embodies Scream 2's overall attitude--self-aware and more than
willing to make fun of itself.
Two years have passed since the Woodsboro murders, and heroine Sidney
Prescott (Neve Campbell) is now a theatre major at Windsor, and film geek
Randy Meeks (Jamie Kennedy) is--natch--a film student there (you would
think he would be rejected, given his extensive qualifications).  Yet while
the scenery and atmosphere around her are different, her luck is not, and
before long she once again finds herself stalked by a killer in a screaming
ghoul costume.  Soon reentering the picture are ever-vain tabloid TV
reporter Gale Weathers (Courteney Cox), who is even more of an egomaniac
after writing a bestseller on the murders (upon which Stab is based); and
ever-dopey Dewey Riley (David Arquette), now-former Woodsboro deputy, who
comes to Windsor to offer Sidney some support.  The rest of Scream 2's
story has been a closely guarded secret, and Dimension Films has gone so
far as to issue a letter urging press to not divulge too many plot
developments.  After seeing the film, it is easy to understand why.  While
the film does settle into a none-too-surprising slasher rhythm, Williamson
cooks up a few surprising plot twists, intelligently incorporating
references to the original to propel the sequel's storyline.  Also, true to
"the rules" of a sequel, he and Craven cook up some elaborately inventive
suspense scenes that set the audience on edge.
As effective as the new scare scenes are, there is no shock sequence in
Scream 2 that matches the original film's chilling prologue, but that is of
little consequence when its humorous side--what makes the Scream movies so
special--is stronger than ever.  Amid all the carnage and screaming,
Williamson and Craven's wit is as sharp as ever, giving dim Dewey overdone
"cool" theme music (directly lifted from Hans Zimmer's score for John Woo's
Broken Arrow) and throwing in barbs at everything from pop culture fixtures
like Sandra Bullock and TV's Friends to "issues" such as the influence of
violent movies and African-Americans' traditional non-presence in horror
movies.  But, of course, the most recurring topic is that of movie sequels.
 Simply bashing them (which the film does to ample degree) is easy, but
Williamson and Craven are a bit more ambitious--attacking their inherent
cheesiness while at the same time embracing it, steering events in some
quintessentially "only in a sequel" turns with tongue planted firmly in cheek.
An ongoing discussion in Scream 2 revolves around whether or not there
has been a movie sequel that is superior to the original.  I would not be
surprised if in Scream 3 (which is all but a foregone conclusion at this
point), we hear the fresh, funny, and frightening Scream 2 mentioned as
proof in the positive.
Michael Dequina
mrbrown@ucla.edu  |  michael_jordan@geocities.com  |  mj23@the18thhole.com
mrbrown@michaeljordanfan.com  |  mj23@michaeljordanfan.com
mrbrown23@juno.com  |  mrbrown@iname.com  |  mst3k@digicron.com
Visit Mr. Brown's Movie Site at http://members.tripod.com/~MrBrown/
Personal Page: http://members.tripod.com/~MrBrown/home.html
Michael Jordan Beyond the Court:
http://www.geocities.com/Colosseum/Field/2302/
A Michael Jordan Fan's Heartbreak:
http://members.tripod.com/~mj23/mj.html
"If you chase something, then sometimes you never get it.
 If you put forth the work and all the attitude, next thing you know
 it's bestowed upon you."
--Michael Jordan

Author
James Brundage
Again comes Randy with the brilliant and perhaps insightful line "Sequels
Suck". But is it true? That is the obvious question. Watching Scream 2 I
pondered over the simple matter, if it was true or if it was a running joke,
a falsity. Was the movie made worse on purpose, a bit of that brilliant
satire that Kevin Williamson showed about a year ago with "Scream", or was
it simply an unavoidable twist of fate.
Were it not for the fact that I respect Williamson so much, and that
Craven's masterful Red Right Hand directed this movie, I would have been
inclined to say Sequels Do Suck. Indeed, the rough draft of the script
sucked (everyone dies, Sidney, Gale, Dewey, Randy, Cotton, and all the new
people you've never heard of.) The hype was mixed, but, going into the
theater I was surprised.
Once again, as has become Williamson's style, a funny and scary opening is
followed by your traditional scary movie pee-break, a twenty to thirty
minute lapse of anything but character development before people get
slashed. And slash away is what Mr. Ghost Face does in this, oh, wait, its
not one of the "S" words.
How, you ask, does that happen when the rule is put down by Randy, the
know-all man of scary movies, that sequels suck? Quite simple, really, it is
both a sequel and a member of a trilogy (there is a running challenge to
find a superior sequel, to which "Empire Strikes Back" is offered, only to
be replied with "Not a sequel, part of a trilogy, planned from the
beginning"). You see, Scream was put out with a script for Scream and a
outline for Scream 2 and Scream 3 (there will probably be, however, a total
of 6 Scream movies.
Of course the fact remains, this sequel is inferior to the original. Sure,
its scarier, but Williamson has been given time to work on his craft of the
horror writing. But with more horror comes less of the comedy (though the
satire stays about the same, even if it is ambiguous).
So how inferior is it? Put Scream at a 10 and Scream 2 is an 8. See it if
you liked the first one. If you didn't, don't bother. If you didn't see the
first one, rent it and then see Scream 2.

Author
Boyd Petrie
Scream 2 (1997)
Rated R for graphic horror violence and gore, and language.
----------  Out of 4 stars: ***1/2 (3 1/2 Stars)
Starring: Neve Campbell, Courtney Cox, Jamie Kennedy, David Arquette,
Jerry O'Connell, Jada Pinkett, Sarah Michelle Gellar, Heather Graham,
Omar Epps, Laurie Metcalf, Duane Martin, Timothy Olyphant, Liev
Schreiber.
"Sequels suck!" explains Randy (Jamie Kennedy), one of the survivors
from last year's surprise box office hit SCREAM.  SCREAM was a
breakthrough film, spoofing the very horror films of the 70s and 80s
which caused the demise of the horror genre.  The characters in SCREAM
had seen those same slasher films and were familiar with them.  They
discussed the cliches, and at the same time, SCREAM used those cliches
by renewing and updating them.  Director Wes Craven had a lot of fun
slamming the genre he helped create, which was ruined by countless and
inferior sequels.  But that doesn't mean that there aren't good
sequels.  The characters in SCREAM 2 openly discuss superior sequels
(ALIENS, THE GODFATHER PART 2, TERMINATOR 2), but this also puts
pressure on Craven and writer Kevin Williamson to create a good enough
sequel as to not become one of the sequels made fun of in the SCREAM
saga.
And SCREAM 2 delivers.  Again, characters are put into a situation of
terror, but while SCREAM had more broad humor, SCREAM 2 is focused
more on the satirical edge of the SCREAM franchise.  The sequel to the
hit SCREAM talks about sequels openly, but what is lacking this time
around is genuine scares, which made the original a hit.  Many of
these moments were everyone's favorite: the "jump" moments.  I love
these moments, because...  well, it scares me.  SCREAM had many of
these moments.  What makes them so effective isn't the sudden
appearance of some unexpected person in the shot, but the loud musical
chord that accompanies the action on screen.  These moments are
incredibly scary, making viewers literally jump in their seats.
SCREAM 2 has fewer of these than its predecessor, and those it does
have aren't as scary.
SCREAM 2 begins in the same way SCREAM did, but much less scarier, and
more satirically.  It opens in a movie theater showing a sneak preview
of STAB!, a filmed version of Gale Weathers' best-selling novel The
Woodsboro Murders, which is based on the murders from the original
film (in essence, we have the movie SCREAM on the screen in SCREAM 2).
We meet two characters standing in line (Jada Pinkett and Omar Epps),
who discuss the teen slasher genre.  Both characters are black, and
Pinkett points out that black people are no where present in horror
films of this kind (as a result, Craven places many black characters
into the film).  In the theater, Ghostface costumes are handed to
every audience member, most of whom don the costume for the film.
However, lurking in the theater is a real killer, wearing the same
costume.  Trying to guess which one it is is the most suspenseful
moment in this scene.  Pinkett's comments are perfect and exactly what
most people said to the original film.  During the opening scene of
STAB!, Casey Becker (Heather Graham) gets phones calls just like Drew
Barrymore did in the original film.  Pinkett yells at the screen,
"Hang up and Star-69 his ass!"  In the end, two people end up dead,
and the serial killings begin once again.
With the two recent killings, reporters begin showing up, and among
them is Gale Weathers (Courtney Cox), who has now gathered a small fan
club (including Laurie Metcalf from TV's "Roseanne").  Also to show up
is Dewey "Dwight" Riley (David Arquette), who now walks with a limp
due to his stab wound a couple years earlier.  Weathers has a new
cameraman (Duane Martin) who has no idea of the events which occurred
a couple years before.  As sequels go, "the body count is always
higher," and so a bigger cast is introduced.  There is Randy (Kennedy)
from the original film, along with his new film freak buddy Mickey
(Timothy Olyphant).  Derek (Jerry O'Connell) is Sidney Prescott's
(Neve Campbell) new beau, and Hallie (Elise Neal) is Sidney's
roommate.  Accompanying Weathers is Cotton Weary (Liev Schreiber), the
wrongly accused killer in SCREAM.  Surprisingly, all these characters
are developed rather nicely, but you pretty much realize that many of
them will be gutted.  Smaller roles include Helen (Sarah Michelle
Gellar) as a designated driver and, in the STAB! film is-wouldn't you
know it?-Tori Spelling as Sidney!  That tricky Williamson... he did
that on purpose (Neve Campbell remarked that Spelling would most
likely play her in a film).
SCREAM 2 may not be as scary as the original film, but it sure
maintains a high level of suspense throughout.  My heart almost never
stopped pounding.  Most of the suspense comes from us knowing
something is going to jump out from behind a corner by the framing of
the shot.  When and who is what makes us hold our breath.  Will it be
the killer, or just a friend?  Sometimes nothing happens, but we still
remain in a tense state, and just as we begin to let our guard down,
something scary occurs on screen.  Unfortunately, it just isn't as
scary this time around, and it's hard to understand why.  The musical
chords are there, and the people jumping out from behind dark shadows
is present, but for some reason, it just doesn't work as well this
time.  Does that make it a lesser film?  Well, actually, yes.  Perhaps
a lot of the blame could be put on the bigger budget, as the original
relied on genuine scares instead of elaborate set pieces.  SCREAM 2
has an incredibly impressive set design, with some set pieces which
are sure to astound audiences.  In fact, the only bad thing about
SCREAM 2 is that lack of scariness. But what it does make up for is in
its technical aspects.
The technical aspects of SCREAM 2 are equal, if not superior, to its
predecessor.  The set design is spectacular, which adds a lot of
suspense by itself.  A highlight involves a Greek play starring
Sidney, but as she is rehearsing for it, she begins to see the killer
on the stage.  The surrealistic portrayal of this scene is very
effective, as the camera spins around, blurring all the Greek masks
together, but you can distinctly see the Ghostface amidst the crowd.
The music, written by Danny Elfman (for the Greek scenes only), is the
best in the film.  Another impressive scene involves a police car, the
killer, and Sidney and her roommate.  It leads up to one of the film's
most genuinely suspenseful moments.  However, after watching SCREAM 2,
I got to feeling that bigger is not always better, because SCREAM had
a pretty small budget (in Hollywood's terms) and the scares were
created by skillful film making instead of elaborate sets.  SCREAM 2
does contain a few "jump" moments that work, but they are all when the
killer jumps out.  When it is a friend, it seems as if Craven didn't
put as much energy into the shock value as he does with the actual
killer.  The Drew Barrymore scene this time around is a good example.
It involves Helen (Gellar) who is stuck in her sorority house alone
because she is the designated driver for the rest of the girls.  She
begins getting calls, and she goes through the same errors that
Barrymore did.  This scene mounts to some incredible tension, but it
ends very quickly, and the possible scares are lost.
The writing of SCREAM 2 is a big highlight.  Kevin Williamson is a
terrific writer, and after the second sequel, he will probably put his
talent towards writing some great comedies or great dramas.  His
satire is some of the best in film, making fun of many other films,
while giving sequels a good name.  The dialogue is witty, and very
realistic.  Most of the characters talk exactly the way your average
person would talk about movies.  Of course, he does include some
stereotypical "dumb blonds," but only for the laugh.  He doesn't put
them in there as actual characters, but as characters in a horror
film.  They know they are in a slasher film, and they act like people
who deserve to be slashed.  Surprisingly, many of the people who get
slashed are the ones we like the most.  Williamson also gives another
surprise ending, which I never guessed.  This film makes you guess,
but if you do get it right, it's only by chance.  As for the
direction, Wes Craven does a masterful job, and he is probably the
only director who takes this genre seriously.  He may spoof it and
slap it around, but he takes it seriously.  He is the most skillful
horror director available, with a long list of the best slasher films
to back him up (NIGHTMARE ON ELM STREET, WES CRAVEN'S NEW NIGHTMARE).
Craven doesn't do as good a job as he did with SCREAM, but it is still
a good job.
The cast is the best aspect of SCREAM 2, giving terrific performances
all around.  Neve Campbell again stars as Sidney, and she does a great
job.  She is probably the best actress in teen slasher history.  Her
kick-ass persona is a major improvement over the frightened, weak
Jamie Lee Curtis of the slasher genre.  Courtney Cox gives an equal
performance to Campbell, but her role is more developed here than in
SCREAM.  Cox provides many of the film's tense moments, including an
extended chase sequence through film school.  Jerry O'Connell gives a
very good performance as Sidney's boyfriend.  This is a major
improvement over his "Sliders" television show.  David Arquette gives
another good performance as Dewey.  Unfortunately, his character has
matured a little, and it's actually a little disappointing.  Jamie
Kennedy provides one of the most shocking moments in the film, and
also some of the funniest lines ("Showgirls," his response to what he
thinks is the scariest film he's ever seen).  Sarah Michelle Gellar
has a small role, but she gives one of the most believable
performances in the film.  Duane Martin is hilarious as the cameraman
who fears for his life when he learns about the fate of Weathers'
ex-cameraman.  Laurie Metcalf gives a very good over-the-top
performance in her small role.  Timothy Olyphant is extremely
effective in his limited role, but his discussions with Randy are
perfect and reasonable.  Liev Schreiber gives a nice performance as
Cotton Weary, and his obsession with being famous could easily be a
motive for killing the teens who accused him of murder.  And
surprisingly, Tori Spelling gives a rather good performance in her
semi-spoof of herself.
SCREAM 2 is rated R for graphic horror violence and gore, and
language.  Again, SCREAM 2 leaves out unnecessary nudity, which
Williamson comments on in his screenplay (Jada Pinkett complains about
Heather Graham stripping in STAB!).  SCREAM 2 marks one of the best
sequels ever created, and probably the best for the teen slasher
genre.  While it may not approach the scariness of the original, it
adds many other elements which make it a very entertaining sequel.
Overall, it isn't as impressive as SCREAM was, but it will surely rake
in the money at the box office.  In fact, it will most likely surpass
the original's grosses due to a high interest in the SCREAM franchise
spawned by the re-inventing SCREAM.  Watch for it to break records its
first weekend (but it will drop rapidly due to the release of the much
anticipated TITANIC opening next week), and remain strong.
Reviewed by Respect (respect@aros.net)
http://www.aros.net/~respect/movies.html

Author
Bert Gene
tag line: "Someone (could it be the producers?) has taken their love for
Sequels too far" 
The much over-hyped Scream 2--directed by horror-veteran Wes Cavern (first
known for his Halloween films) and written by the industry's latest hip
screenwriter Kevin Smith---exemplifies the latest tastelessness and greed
of Hollywood franchise movie-making in unrelenting pursuit of the ole
mighty dollar by hitting its Gen-X viewers over the head with its bag of
tired plot twists and hollow characters. For a couple of film makers known
for having a track record for "getting it" in terms of knowing what the
audience expects, Scream 2 shows that Cavern and Smith do NOT definitely
"get it" this time around. 
This "must see sequel" begins with the sneak preview of "Stab" with Maureen
McCormick (Jada Pinkett of Facts of Life) and Phil Stevens (Cuba Gooding
Jr.of Jerry Maguire) bitching about how long the damn line is. At one
point, smart-mouth Jada does well to sum up the mood of most of the
viewers, "I don't wanna see some dumbass white movie about some dumbass
white girl being chased by some dumbass killer." For me personally, I don't
wanna see a dumbass movie of any dumbass nationality period! 
They finally get inside the theater where we constantly cut to scenes of
"Stab" which is just a poor excuse to use clips from the original movie
Scream. This is just a lame gimmick for the studios to save a buck, last
seen in Back to the Future Part 2 where they used numerous footage from the
original movie. 
However, one difference is that they unsuccessfully attempted to disguise
this trick through today's technological advancement in visual effects.
What they do is they CGI the new faces over the original actors face. For
instance, Tori Spelling (of Melrose Place) is morphed over Neve Campbell
(of Party of Five) in the role of Sidney for the movie "Stab." Last time I
checked CGI is pretty expensive...what was Miramax thinking? Did they watch
too many Robert Zemeckis flicks?...this explains the the Back to the Future
Part 2 influence. 
The smarter thing to do would've been the old fashion method...hire NEW
ACTORS to play the roles! But again why would Tori Spelling be stupid
enough to accept a part in this sequel when she was the main butt of jokes
in the original. Tori would be the last to wanna play some dumbass white
girl in this movie. No wonder they had to CGI Tori for this film. 
Not only does this CGI scheme backfire the studio's plan to save money, but
it also just plain insults the audience's intelligence...what idiot would
not notice the horrible cheesy CGI effects?! Everyone knows Tori does not
look that grotesque on the big screen. Last time I've check, Tori was a
blond bombshell, not some sagging bleached brunnette. 
Anyways back to the story...if there is one. Returning in the sequel are
the survivors of the first original horrid horror film: hapless idiot
Sidney (Neve Campbell), superbitch reporter Gale (Courtney Love),
video-geek Randy (Jamie Kennedy), OJ wannabe Cotton (Liev Taylor) and
asinine security guard Dewey (David Arquette). 
Also joining them are a crop new stabbing victims up for Ghostface's
picking. They are Sarah Jessica Gellar (Buffy the Vampire Slayer), Jerry
O'Connel (Stand By Me, Star Trek), Elise Neal (A Different World), and
Laurie Metcalf (Roseanne). These characters are never really developed and
just are brainless cattle that add to the sequels higher bodycount. 
And for the plot? Well, being too stupid to take a relaxing trip to Europe,
Sidney and the rest of them decide to go to college where there's nothing
more like calculus homework to soothe one from the emotional trauma of
being almost butchered the previous year. 
As soon as the copy cat killer makes its presence known on campus, the
movie shoves its copy cat script of the original up the audience's naive
ass. Instead of a bunch of superficial high schoolers, the movie sets its
havoc amongst superficial sorority gals and fraternity brats whose lives
are already complicated enough with big problems such as finding kegs,
eating pizza, and getting laid. (Lots of change between high school and
college hey?) These characters get so much of the audience's sympathy that
when one is killed by Spookface, yawns from the audience fill the theater
with a great sense of loss (...of attention that is). 
Moreover, the sequel constantly backfires on itself by the way it continues
to unintentionally remind the audience of how awful the movie is. In
particular, at one point we watch a scene with a bunch of uptight film
students discussing how awful sequels are compared to its predecessor. Was
the writer and director too oblivious to see this inside joke that we the
audience chuckled at? Why in the hell would you keep reminding an audience
that's watching a sequel that sequels suck? That's like Taco Bell telling
its customers to their face that the burritos they're eating will give them
diarrhea. 
To avoid being castrated by the latest Scream fanatic, I won't reveal
details of who gets killed and what happens. You'll just have to waste the
7 bucks yourself to find out. 
One thing I can tell is that you don't have to be a psychic to figure that
there's gonna be a part 3 sometime in the near future. 
An Idea for Kevin Smith: In "Scream 3," the killers behind the masks are a
fat, four-eyes movie critic and his boney-ass bald partner, trying to
discredit horror movies so they won't have to sit through anymore and then
get their heads shot by Sidney so regular folks don't have to listen their
bitchy and moaning critiques anymore either. 
I hope one day Kevin goes back to making witty twenty-something films
instead of writing worthless horror trash. 

Author
Homer Yen
Let me give you an example of just how deliciously nerve-racking this
film is.  As this movie opens, hundreds of patrons eagerly crowd into
a theatre, which is premiering a movie called "STAB."  It's an eerie
Rocky Horror atmosphere as moviegoers don unsettling ghost-like masks
and wield rubber knives.  "STAB" is based on the Woodsboro murders and
the series of events that transpired in the original SCREAM movie.  15
minutes into watching "STAB", a patron goes into the bathroom.  The
urinals are all being used by people wearing ghost-like faces.  He is
forced to use a stall.  Bad decision.  15 minutes into watching
SCREAM2, I had to go to the bathroom.  There I stood...all alone...and
I actually was afraid that I would feel a knife plunge through my
back.  Was this a strange case of life imitating art?  It was
definitely a disturbing feeling of deja vu.
The movie theatre incident causes several people to reunite, including
Gale Weathers (Courney Cox), who penned the book that ultimately
became "STAB"; Sidney (Neve Campbell), who was the intended target of
the Woodsboro killings; and Deputy Dewey and geeky Randy (David
Arquette and Jamie Kennedy), who were also lucky survivors.  Sidney,
now attending college, is also joined by her roommate, new boyfriend
and other classmates and sorority sisters.  It's deja vu for Sidney
and her friends too.  Under the assumption that this new killer is out
to finish what ended in failure at Woodsboro, everyone works as fast
as they can to try to figure out who the killer(s) is/are and
his/her/their motive(s).  Each one knows that they will become a
target.  Each one fears for their lives.  But these are a smart bunch
of people versed in the horror genre, and they make a valiant attempt
to outwit the killer.  But the killer(s) is/are also equally smart.
And this time, the killer is more merciless, resourceful, and cunning.
I liked a lot of things about this sequal.  The characters are
three-dimensional and don't succumb to movie cliches.  Women don't go
upstairs by themselves to check out strange noises.  There are no
empty-headed bimbos.  No one say's "I'll be right back", only to never
return.    Each character is smart and tries to take control of their
own fate.  The writing is witty and smart.  Also, the look and feel of
the movie takes the horror genre to an entirely different level.
Though it is nothing more than a simple horror movie, it looks like an
expensive movie with elaborate sets.  Each scene is
well-choreographed, nicely shot, terrifically edited and eerily
scored, which delivers some real heart-pounding moments.  You'll be
scared, you'll be immensely enraged when some of your favorite
characters become the next victims, and you'll root for the survivors,
hoping that they'll succeed.  There are also some terrific moments of
levity to savor, such as the new boyfriend trying to convince Sidney
that he is not the killer by doing a Tom Cruise impersonation and a
wonderful, developing bond between the arrogant Gale Weathers and the
meek Dewey, all the while the theme from Twin Peaks is playing in the
background.
One of its greatest accomplishments is for making us want to know who
did it and why?  Unfortunately, its dénouement requires us, to some
degree, to have seen the first movie.  Nonetheless, this movie
delivers in several satisfying ways, not the least of which is the
fact that it's just a plain, old, fun movie to watch.  It's not as
genuinely frightening as the first one, but it remains fresh and
exciting.  Probably it's greatest feat, however, is that we have a
sequel that is an equal to its original.

Author
Kristian Lin
Warning: This review gives out crucial plot information.  Do not read
further if you wish to be surprised.
Director Wes Craven and writer Kevin Williamson are B.S. artists.  But
they're great B.S. artists, and they're getting better at it.  I'm one
of the minority who found much of the cleverness in the original SCREAM
to be pseudoclever and self-congratulatory (although, I admit, I enjoyed
it all the same).  I enjoyed SCREAM 2 even more, although I have some of
the same mixed feelings.
The sequel follows Sidney Prescott (Neve Campbell) to college, where she
has moved from Woodsboro (where the original movie's murders took place)
and now majors in theater.  Movie geek Randy (Jamie Kennedy) is there,
too, studying film.  So is a copycat killer, who strikes at the premiere
of a movie called "Stab," which is based on the account of the Woodsboro
murders by Gale Weathers (Courteney Cox).  Sure enough, Gale shows up
looking for her next story, as does Dewey (David Arquette), who wants to 
protect Sidney.
The killer's first three victims are college students played by Omar
Epps, Jada Pinkett, and Sarah Michelle Gellar.  This totally wiped me
out.  At least the black couple gets an entertaining conversation about
the absence of African-Americans in slasher movies (Pinkett watches
Heather Graham playing Drew Barrymore's part in "Stab" and says, "Bitch,
hang up the phone and star 69 his ass.")  But the incisive, dewy-eyed
Gellar doesn't even get a chance to register.  Fortunately, some
compensation comes from the other actors.  The brawny Jerry O'Connell
proves unexpectedly light on his feet as Sidney's boyfriend, and he gets
to serenade her in a cafeteria with "I Think I Love You" (ŕ la Rupert
Everett in MY BEST FRIEND'S WEDDING).  Liev Schreiber only had a cameo
in SCREAM as Cotton Weary, the man wrongly accused of Sidney's mother's
murder.  The role is considerably expanded here, and he disturbingly
suggests that Cotton might be guilty of something after all.
But all these new faces only drew my attention to the old ones, and I
made some observations that escaped me when I saw the original.  Then
again, maybe it was just Neve Campbell's hair that made me think about
her acting.  Her hair, long in the original, is bobbed here.  The new
'do leaves her face more exposed, and it makes her look leaner, as if
the various tragedies in her life have scraped her down to the bone. 
But it also drew my attention to her facial expressions, and she only
uses a few in the SCREAM movies.  She has the one scared look, and then
she adjusts it slightly for her tough look, when she faces down the
killer.   Then she has that toothy grin that she occasionally flashes. 
I'm not a "Party of Five" watcher, so I might be missing something.  But
the SCREAM plots seem to be limiting her range - as she's written,
Sidney Prescott is a normal young woman who just happens to have had
four people in her life murder 11 other people.  Sidney's seen so much
death, you wouldn't blame her if she snapped and started slashing up
victims herself in SCREAM'S inevitable third installment.  And beyond
that, I don't know who she is.  This isn't all or even half Campbell's
fault.  But she doesn't suggest any more about the character.
Character problems hamper Courteney Cox, too.  Not that she has the
wrong attitude - on the contrary, she seems relieved to indulge the
nasty side that her Monica Geller frequently represses on "Friends." 
But Gale Weathers really needed an actress who could be mean in broader
strokes, say, Kelly Preston.  Cox's subtler skills fit the TV screen and
would probably do really well in smaller movie roles, but in a part like 
this, she doesn't fill the bill.  Further, Williamson tries to
complicate Gale by showing her concern for Dewey - her one redeeming
feature.  It's an admirable impulse, but the writer doesn't make it jibe
with the rest of the character.  Cox, a smart actress, seems unsure of
the precise boundaries of Gale's bitchiness.  I'm not sure myself.  The
part was smaller in the original, but it's only going to expand, and it
needs to be fixed.
I came out of SCREAM 2 feeling energized by its cleverness but also with
the same oddly depressed feeling I got from the original.  It isn't that
I have Gene Siskel's prejudice against serial killer movies - they're as
formulaic as any other film genre, and I think THE SILENCE OF THE LAMBS
may still be the decade's greatest film.  That movie boasted a literate,
rational, superintelligent killer fully capable of assessing situations
and analyzing other people.  Killers in these movies tend to be mute
death machines who kill people without distinction.  Well, but what
about the monster in the ALIEN movies?  OK, that killer isn't
interesting, but its potential victims are fully developed people
(especially Ripley, of course, and her shipmates in the first movie). 
The victims in most slasher movies are just as much cardboard figures as
the murderer.  That's less the case in the SCREAM movies - the
characterizations are still thin, but at least they're somewhat
defined.  The problem is that they're all helpless in the face of this
killer, which annihilates dramatic possibilities.  The great cast in
SCREAM 2 only highlights this; you can't help watching the demises of
Epps, Pinkett and Gellar without lamenting the waste of perfectly good 
actors.  These movies are fun, but wasn't the final confrontation in THE
SILENCE OF THE LAMBS all the more nerve-wracking because you knew who
Clarice Starling and Jame Gumb were?
My favorite moment in SCREAM 2 is when Randy strikes back at the killer
during their phone conversation.  He starts off sarcastically, saying
that his favorite scary movie is SHOWGIRLS.  Eventually, though, he
turns insulting.  "Why are you imitating a couple of high school
losers?" he yells into the phone, and he starts casting aspersions at
the original killers, particularly Billy Loomis, whom Randy
characterizes as a repressed homosexual mama's boy.  Randy is killed a
moment later, and his verbal outburst is his final blaze of glory.  His
smart-ass attitude makes him a marginally more deserving candidate for
death than the others, but he also hits the killer's psychological weak
spot.  It's like Dennis Hopper goading Christopher Walken into killing
him in TRUE ROMANCE.  Randy's victory is only a moral one (and, like
most moral victories, an empty one), but he does what no one else in the
two movies manages to do.  Sidney and Gale stop the killers, but only
Randy makes him lose control.  It's one moment where the SCREAM
franchise touches greatness.

Author
Harvey S. Karten
 Reviewed by Harvey Karten, Ph.D.
 Dimension Films
 Director:  Wes Craven
 Writer:  Kevin Williamson
 Cast: David Arquette, Neve Campbell, Courteney Cox, Sarah
Michelle Gellar, Jamie Kennedy, Jerry O'Connell, Jada
Pinkett, Liev Schreiber, Duane Martin
   There must be something about film school that inspires the
liveliest and most articulate class discussion.  In one scene of
"Scream 2," Wes Craven, who gained his 15+ minutes of
fame by having directed the series "Nightmare on Elm Street,"
has us observing a class of collegians at Windsor College
somewhere in the Midwest involved in a heated discussion
about the nature of sequels.  It seems clear that these young
people are caught up in the enthusiasm, not simply trying to
influence the professor, who looks on benignly as his students
debate whether sequels are always worse than the originals. 
While the class is divided down the middle, all agree that
"Godfather 2" was better than its predecessor and, in the best
tradition of one-upmanship, the suggestion that the second
part of "The Empire Strikes Back" was better than the original
is met by the correct rebuttal that "The Empire Strikes Back"
is a trilogy and therefore never had a sequel.
   The point of the discussion is also the point of this film:
satire.  By suggesting that it is almost impossible to one-up
forerunners, Wes Craven deliberately disparages himself--and
it's not the first time.  "Scream 2," targeted to an prime
audience of people from ages 18 to 28, is meant primarily as
satire, or, Craven's laughing at himself for what he and his
colleagues have contributed to slasher movies.  Not that
"Scream 2" is campy like "The Rocky Horror Show," which is
an off-the-wall, perpetual midnight offering featuring an
audience themselves dressed in horrific outfits and wildly
cheering the mayhem on the screen.  "Scream 2" is, rather a
film meant to be taken seriously almost as much as it is
meant to be a spoof.
   The problem with seeing this as satire is that there are
genuinely scary moments in this sequel which, following the
formula suggested by one of the college students in the class
discussion, must have a higher body count, more blood, and
yet still feature serial killers who are white, preferably male. 
In fact, since the body count is so high and since some of the
murders are enacted before our eyes in all their horror, the
terror is greater than the travesty.  "Scream 2" works primarily
as a genuine film of fright and panic and only intermittently as
burlesque, which is good enough.
   Featuring some of the same actors from the original,
principally David Arquette, Courtney Cox and Liev Schreiber,
the movie opens on a crowd lining up to see a sneak preview
of the movie "Stab" which has, essentially, a plot quite similar
to that of Craven's "Scream."  Many of the kids in the
audience don skeletal masks reminiscent of Edvard Munch's
painting "Scream" (housed permanently in the Oslo Museum
in Norway), which clues us in that one of them will, of course,
commit at least one murder during the course of the sneak
preview.  The jokiest moments of this two-hour work come at
the beginning particularly with the jive dialogue engaged in by
Phil (Omar Epps) and his date Maureen (Jada Pinkett), the
latter wondering why she's even going to the type of film that
features almost all lily-white performers.  When Phil goes to
the john, he runs into something far scarier than anything he
might have seen had he stayed the course while Maureen
should have stayed home to study as she insisted she would
have preferred to do.
   While the campus is horrified by the murders of these two
fellow students, few seem to feel that they might be next. 
They continue to party, to engage in fraternity hell weeks,
even to stay home alone when others are out having fun at
mixers.  From the information we are given we realize that
quite a few people could have been the perp or perps,
particularly Cotton Weary (Liv Schreiber) who had spent a
year in jail on the testimony of Sidney Prescott (Neve
Campbell) before being cleared of murder and may be
seeking revenge against his accuser.  The hard-boiled Gale
Weathers (Courteney Cox) had written a novel based on the
murders a year back and has returned to the scene to report
on a new spate of killing which--scripter Kevin Williamson
hints--she may be committing herself to pave the way for her
next book.   A guy named Mickey seems obsessively intent
on proving that horror movies may themselves influence real-
life behavior, which provides him with a motive, and a local
reporter, Debbie Salt (Laurie Metcalf), hides a possible
vengeance motif as well.  
   The movie's scariest scene involve a situation in which
several people are wearing masks, particularly one involving a
rehearsal for a Greek tragedy featuring the character of
Cassandra, played by Sidney, as she is surrounded by a
dozen performers whose faces are complete hidden by masks
of tragic figures.
   Some of the film's comic relief comes from Joel (Duane
Martin), who has been accompanying the novelist to film her
interview but wants out when he is called on to snap shots of
some bloody murder scenes.  
   When "Scream 2" is not downright hair-raising, it succeeds
admirably in one Pirandellian scene, namely, when college
students debate the way actors perform in sequels while they
are themselves actors in a sequel.  If the movie poses a
question to ponder for more than twenty minutes after you
leave the theater it is the age-old query: do violent movies
encourage violence in real life, or do they provide an outlet for
feelings of frustration and thereby actually defuse murderous
impulses?   Rated R.  Running Time: 122 minutes.  (C) 1997
Harvey Karten

Author
Joe Chamberlain
Starring Neve Campbell; David Arquette; Courtney Cox & Sarah Michelle Gellar
Somebody is taking their love of sequels too far. Although it isn't Wes
Craven. If ever a horror movie deserved a sequel, it was Scream. The
original was, in this reviewer's humble opinion, the best horror film of all
time. While scream 2 might not be number 2 on the list, it is certainly top
5.
Scream 2 picks up a couple of years after the first movie left off. Sidney
Prescott (Neve Campbell) has gone off to university as has one of the few
survivors of the first blood bath, film trivia buff Randy Meeks (Jamie
Kennedy) who steals most of the scenes he is in, as he did in the first
film. Enough time has elapsed so that journalist Gale Weathers (Courtney
Cox) has written a book about the original murders, and it has been made
into its own slasher flick "Stab". The release of Stab has obviously given
someone a few ideas. The murders begin again. It seems our friend in the
black cloak and goulish white mask has been lurking around again and toting
a very sharp knife that is just perfect for carving up coeds at Sidney's
university.
Also returning from the first film is David Arquette playing deputy Dewey
Riley. Joining the cast for this go round are Buffy The Vampire Slayer's
Sarah Michelle Gellar as a sorority sister and Slider's Jerry O'Connell as
Sidney's new boyfriend.
It is hard to compare the sequel to the original. Scream 2 has the same
great dialogue as the first film and continues the great parody of slasher
films and pop culture. The only problem is it is not as new any more. When
Scream came out no one had ever seen a slasher film so well made before, so
it had the extra advantage of never having been tried. With scream 2, the
solid writing and plot twists are expected, so in small way it takes a
little bit of the fun out of it. Scream 2 is definitely the best horror film
you will see this year. (Although Screenwriter Kevin Williamson's other
horror film of 1997, I Know What You Did Last Summer, is close second.) A
word to the wise though, this is not a film for younger children or the
easily upset. This is a very violent and bloody film. Those that saw the
first film will know what to expect. Word to the wise #2 -- Those that
haven't seen the first film should go out and rent it before seeing Scream
2. Unlike the slasher films of yore this movie has a plot and that plot is
heavily dependent upon the fact that the audience has to be real familiar
with the events of the first movie. Trust me, if you haven't seen the first
film, not only will you miss out on most of the inside jokes in the film you
will be completely lost before you get halfway through this movie.
It is great to see TV stars Courtney Cox, Neve Campbell, Sarah Michelle
Gellar and Jerry O'Connell move to the big screen. It proves that TV stars
really can carry a big screen effort. Although, they owe a lot of thanks to
Kevin Williamson's screenplay and the direction of Wes Craven. I guess if
you put all the right people together on a project you can't help making a
good movie. Too bad Hollywood doesn't come to that conclusion more often.
One of the best horror films you will see this year 8/10
